Stop hunching your shoulders, straighten your back and stand up tall and you will automatically look so much better. you look very handsome regardless, but those are the first things I noticed.  [This is me](http://imgur.com/EeVlBHy)
Maybe a satoshi
I'd never heard of this...oh dear god whyyyyy did I google it????
Personally, I'm glad to hear you're considering not doing the circumcision at all based on available research. As a dude with a dangly anteater of my own, there are no real drawbacks to keeping the tip.   It's hard for me to comment on the religious side of it though. It's easy enough for me to say, "Do what you want. You're the parents, not them." but I don't know your situation.   Personally, there is no room for extremism in my life, and I'd consider "extremely Orthodox" a form of extremism. Will it cause animosity in the family and potential resentment towards your son? Maybe. But are there advantages of shielding him from that sort of negative lifestyle? Sure.   Good luck!
Dat Backfat
Or maybe because a cop on a freaking segway is hilarious and not in the least bit intimidating?
The reason I ask is because someone was telling me today that they do not actually take organs from people who are dead. Only those who are "brain dead" (and many have differing views on what that actually is) so the patients are all still alive when the organs are taken so who knows how many people felt the whole ordeal. I don't know if there is any truth to this, but I did hear it from a very intelligent lady. Anyone know anything about this?
"Promo code has expired or been used up."
Also, general Darkthrone worship thread.   Great album
[Broken Butterfly in Resident Evil 4.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SSC2jx3QMXw)
Sorry, Doc. I have a minute left in work and I took it out on you. :(  I'd really love to here an actual answer for this question but...could be difficult. 
I did too.  I cut the cord of my NES zapper so I could play with it outside.
Really :(  My bd pet is UC which can't wear stuff... I guess the people are low enough I can battle with other pets right now, but I really hope there aren't more like this higher up.  Edit: Huh,Didn't know I ever trained Sharkaroo (maybe its all the lab work he did). But hes level nine, but has better stats (for most things) that my actual bd pet. what the fuck was I doing as a kid?
My friends are pretty useless. They'd say yes but then back out at the last minute.
My brother walked in on me, having sex.  For clarification. I wasn't the one having sex.
[American News Outlet](http://thelede.blogs.nytimes.com/2013/02/28/video-of-man-being-dragged-behind-police-van-prompts-murder-inquiry-in-south-africa/?ref=world) - I reckon the NY Times are rather reliable, excuse me if they aren't; I'm from Europe. [This](http://www.spiegel.de/panorama/justiz/brutale-festnahme-in-suedafrika-zu-tode-geschleift-a-886235.html) is my original source, a reliable german news outlet.  Apparently the man is a taxidriver and was "obstructing the traffic", so the police had to intervene. Then this happened, according to the police:  &gt;The officers claimed that the man assaulted one of the officers and grabbed his gun, before the other officer “overpowered the taxi driver and handed the firearm back to his colleague.”  After that they handcuffed him to the truck and dragged him a few hundred meters to the police station, where he later died from head trauma. An unnamed prisoner claims that the officers continued beating the taxi driver at the station.
Shhhhhh, rhey don't need food when we can snuggle
dude, thats basically every friendzone story ive ever heard. i never understood why girls friendzone us dudes all the time...
[You are correct](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Keyboard_layout#Switzerland_.28German.2C_French.2C_Italian.2C_Romansh.29.2C_Liechtenstein.2C_Luxembourg)
The only thing I'm worried about is the summer when I like wearing no-show socks. I'm worried that the cork/leather heel is going to scrape my Achilles to raw skin. The cotton on the Jordan 5 killed me with that.   Otherwise, the upper bends just as you'd expect a shoe to bend. If I was a sadist, I'd dissect the shoe with a boxcutter just to see what's below the cork layer at the toe box.
/r/hailcorporate
Sometimes, I lie just because I want to lie.
An overlooked fact: We eat the product of a chicken's period most mornings. 
"Are you even playing this game? Do you even HAVE this game? Are you sure you're not playing counterstrike right now?"
I tired it. It didn't boost me at all. 
Wow! I think I just popped a boner!
That's too bad, man. You did well with whatever you used to replace your equipment.
You mean the Dimples of Venus? Can't provide link, on my phone right now. 
Jack Adams award.
That's a sideburn splitting joke right there.
Want me to bury my face in there?
I agree. I hope some of the game is set in Georgian London so we can climb some buildings.  I liked some of the naval battles but I really don't want the whole game isn't centred on them. 
Stunned that it didn't happen sooner.
Pretending as though implied consent does not exist is fucking delusional.   Period.
ok im getting the impression you missed the entire point of everything in this thread
Mother of god [reposts] (http://qkme.me/3t6olo) 
It is underwater but the tiger is hating every minute of it.
Oh. My. God. A wizard hat... those are hard to come by.
watch it all the way through, it gets dark and disturbing quickly. was a good watch.
The rope and the dart.
I used to get conscious and conscience mixed up spelling wise.  I knew which definition I meant, and they're obvious in their use which one is being referred to.  But it took me forever.  Also principle and principal.  Yet effect and affect have never really been a problem for me.
[Tommy Edison's POV](http://youtu.be/XpUW9pm9wxs)
Lake adventures with old friends are interrupted by a giant rodent, a fighter jet, and a fur-clad hunter who forced me to listen to terror stories from the fifties.  I wrote about the whole things [here in /r/Dreams](/r/Dreams/comments/koegj/i_dreamt_about_exploring_a_lake_with_old_friends/) a while ago.
I feel like that. If it hadn't been for the last 2 weeks of stress, panic and constant "review meetings" to discuss whether they would keep me over the whole mess caused by me talking I would be telling them to shut it more. I really hate this and I hate people talking like that around me.  Today's bitchy rant that drove me to go "I can't stay quiet!" was one about a poor old carpenter we have that works for the same company. He has breathing difficulties so is always out of breath. Today they were talking about how disgusting he is as a human being and the sound of him breathing makes them think he's a dirty pervert. Apparently he's so fat and disgusting to them, that they don't think he should still be breathing anymore -_- This was out of nowhere, he hasn't been in to see us in weeks and only comes in when we ask him to sign for something. He's a lovely old man (I say old, he's probably only 60... but he still works hard and doesnt deserve that kind of talk). Just urg.
Or maybe they have something called "champeign" where he is from...like...kool aid mixed with cooks...on second thought that sounds good
Now there's a god that might actually make more sense.  I can buy a lot of things, but suffering in hell for eternity for a lack of belief is not one of them.
Really? about how far do I want to be away from enemies to maximize damage output? Also I honestly had no clue about this.
That's some pretty good tequila to drink before making it too.
It's a huge trend now. Freaky shit.
That's your opinion, I could say more valuable space occupied gives you a better chance if winning or w/e.
I don't see any of these as the fundamentals. My faith stands on the person of Jesus the Redeemer and that alone.  Abortion, sexuality, civic involvement, whatever else you can argue about... Some of it may be important to individuals or the nation, but none of it is fundamental except Jesus.   What the heck does "legitimate religion" mean? Pietistic? informative? Imperial? Worthy of demanding behavior standards from non-Christians? Who the hell cares if I think someone else's religion is legitimate, or if they think mine isn't?
I'm game for all 5... But if just one, make mine chocolate please.
I second this idea. Zelda: Link's Awakening DX, save the rest for Oracle of Ages and Oracle of Seasons. I'm a Zelda fanwhore, but they are great games even when one isn't.
She gets nervous and wont stop talking, and Facebook. 
Today I spent like Ten and some change!!! That's everything in the first picture. All told I've probably spent $30. I am SUPAH cheap, I don't have a job so I have plenty of time to spend shopping around for discounts and sales. Apparently the Dollar stores where I live are changing colors/displays so I got a whole set for $4 and it had 8 bottles in it!
Next time you could also talk about x linkage.  deleterious alleles on the xchromosome can't be hidden in males.
Why are they (or you) considering a hysterectomy?
I hate to point out the obvious technicality but:  &gt; The US has never developed a cyberweapon aimed at china.  He is free to continue claiming this even after acknowledging Stuxnet until there is proof that the US "aimed" it at China. Almost all indicators point to Iran being the intended target, but due to the fact that it is a worm, found itself in computer systems of countries that likely have large amounts of communication with Iranian machines. There is no indicator the intended target was China, so the US did not "aim" it at them.  &gt; The US has never used a cyberweapon against china (successful or not).  Again, this depends on your definition of against. The intended role of Stuxnet, from all analysis of it, is that the worm was intended to infect specific Iranian machines and cause disruption to their nuclear program. Stuxnet infected the personal computers of AEOI staff, and likely nodes that communicated with these computers, or nodes that those computers were likely to communicate with (for the purposes of eventually infecting the target). There's also evidence that the Stuxnet payload only was intended to operate on the specific machines targeted in the attack, and for the most part did. The infections of computers other than the targets were mostly tangential. Yes, the US likely used a cyberweapon if you consider collateral damages.
Never seen anyone hold a pen like that. I hold the shaft of the pen between my index finger and thumb and rest it on the first knuckle of my middle finger. Maybe if you practice holding your pen differently, you can begin to have better control over your writing.
The point is this - the principle in your link is for things that are *indistinguishable except for their names* for a reason.  If they're substantively different, those substantive difference will affect the probability distribution.  If they're indistinguishable, it's reasonable to assume their probability distributions will be equal because there are no substantive differences to affect the probability distribution.  If they're substantively different, you can't ignore the substantive differences unless you can show that they don't affect the probability distribution.  Can you show that the substantive differences between the existence/non existence of something beyond physical reality don't affect the probability distribution?  I don't think you can, so conclusions you draw based on an equal probability distribution are flawed.
When I was a kid, everyone around had tried to convince me that there is an invisible wizard living in the sky, creating talking snakes.  That shit was pretty fucking elaborate... I mean they had big palaces ran by old men in silly hats and capes that forced me to drink his blood and shit...
Exactly what we're trying to stop.
Oh definitely.  They've probably never experienced a life changing injury or dealt with major adversity in general within their own lives.  They take what they have for granted.  I'll add you on twitter/facebook and look forward to reading your book when you complete it!  Keep us posted!
Found.
Woosh?
Sounds legit
Can't you call in sick ?
/r/HailCorporate 
What about it
You do. Do you see it?
http://www.reactiongifs.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/12/abandon.gif
In the past, part of the reason for visiting NK was the strangeness of seeing shops with no products or entering welcome buildings which are perfect except for something bizarrely important like light and heat.   Some have criticized that kind of visit as a kind of poverty porn, serving as an embarrassment to the host country whether they realize it or not. From this reply, it seems like these things are being seen less often by visitors.   What do you tell potential tourists who are uncomfortable with at least the perception of an unsavory aspect to touring very poor countries?   Have you noticed any differences in the kinds of tourists you're getting? 
death tags are from the mods. just like all other tags besides nsfw
I'm just a regular everyday normal guy
Yeah, that would be ideal.
Interesting chart; especially the idea that many ideas along the outer rim are beneficial to life.
&gt; EA is one of our best partners  Sorry, folks! There's no hope.
will 10 V be able to produce an arc?
Deal. 
Kick him out. Now.   You don't need this shit around your child.
False, it got bumped because MLS needed the stadium. And Hillsboro (Portland Metro) has a minor league team. The Portland Beavers were there forever (1903–1917, 1919–1972, 1978–1993, 2001–2010) but it doesn't matter because eventually you get tired of the sex doll and want a real girlfriend. 
She probably found a guy that let his friends break two of his fingers.
Obviously what those two employees did was not work-appropriate in the slightest, but you fucked up their lives without an apparent thought on how it would effect them.   If she was willing to *have sex* to keep her job, she probably needed it really badly.   In terms of protocol and paperwork, you made a fine move as a manager. As a person though...
It says  New England Douchebaggery Level : 6
where did you break your spinal cord? how high is your lession??
What were your plans?
True. But the only good ways to sleep are either on your back, or on your side. Never sleep on your stomach, that causes some bad shit.
"Sunless" refers to the Hylek. They call undead "Sunless ones". Since they named him, it makes sense. :3
ok then did you register my friend code?
Childish? How is consistently and strongly presenting the facts and moral stances you believe in childish?
this is the first time I've seen this, and judging by the upvotes, I'm not the only one. I'm sorry that reddit is so full of newer users, but always seeing karmadecay posts on things I've never seen is like a friend telling a joke and someone else going "yeah, steve, we've all heard that one before..." when half of the people haven't.
You're awesome too, Tony.
[](/shiningarmor)Someone seems to be slacking with the special welcome.   [](/grannysmith)SHELLBULLET.  [](/ohhi) Oh and welcome to the herd!
That should be done somewhere private, not the men's locker room in school where the gym teacher can walk in on you. Do that in like a hotel, not a bathroom, especially a public one, unless you have a large one in your own home where four to five people can fit inside, and nobody else is at home, but pretty much, it's guys gathering in a circle masturbating.  No, I haven't tried it, and hopefully, never will; to me, it's just something that straight guys do to overcome homophobia. It's not that I'm homophobic, I'm not; it's just something I rather do in private by myself.  If you want to go, that's your decision, but I would'nt recommend it if it takes place in the boy's locker room in school.
This reminds me of Robert McCloskey's children's story *Make Way for Ducklings* that I used to read as a kid, which was set in Boston's public gardens. The story was even immortalized with a set of bronze statues of a mother duck and her ducklings walking through that very same park.  Does anyone else remember this story?
Levi 511 jeans are awesome.
Yahoo is looking for account managers for their web service
17, pm me 
Mining is so mundane in EVE that it can easily be managed by one person even if you do it 20 times at once. Add that to fleet mechanics, and a bot is essentially useless.
looks like something that you would hang up in a primary school
Except I think Haytham was born in London and not the Caribbean. 
Does this work with Canadian Subways?
"What brings all the racists and antiracists"  Probably mentioning race.
Our 16 week old started drooling and chewing his hands around 3 weeks ago. I thinks it's early teething, it could be months and months before they actually come in!  The feeding could be a growth spurt (look up wonder weeks).   Teething necklace for you or baby? I got two that I wear (one wood one plastic like) but he won't pay any attention to them yet only his hands or our fingers and knuckles :) 
That pun was baaaaad...
I love your username! My thoughts are: people procrastinate and don't follow directions well. You are not alone.
I was just checking him out before getting to your post. Sounds like a cool character. If not, i at least hope he's allied with Edward.
I asked him and he looked shifty and said "nooo. I'm... uh... Sam."  He was trying to cover up his beard too, but it's a big bushy fucker.
The internet IS useless clutter. If we start getting specific about what's truly important, we'll have this whole thing pruned down to a single paragraph in no time. 
sorry, i actually got an offer by PM, so im going to say no for now, but ill get back to you if this goes south.
H2F, trolling Bnet, montages. lol
For any two different numbers you can always find another number in between. There is no number that is both greater than 0.999... and less than 1 so they are the same value. They are just different representations of the same value. 
Pics of your living space?
Seriously!  I have the WORST under eye circles.  They're permanent - nothing I can do about it.  Anyways, tried it this a.m. - still a little dry looking.  I have creased under eyes, too.  I'm gonna keep giving it a go, maybe trying different ways to apply it.  I have the Erase Paste coming, too.  SOMETHING HAS GOT TO GIVE.  What's your favorite right now?  I'm trying to move from powder foundation to liquid to see if that helps with any of my under eye dryness situation.
9,894,952 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,894,952 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around - 9,894,951 bottles of beer on the wall!
Awww I'm so glad people are enjoying it! Thanks!
&gt; Green Street Realty has several one bedrooms available for under $600/month near campus, though I don't know if they're a good company to rent from or not.  better than most people think but not super. definitely beats the shit-fest that is CPM
It's all fun and games until someone's parents die.  FTFY
Goodamnit; I'm an overweight washed up 40 year old rapper who has no job recording contract or money and my girlfriend bangs anyone she meets. 
Sacrebleu! Voila un monstre!
and no its not time to lock it up yet, shes still young so i wanna give her time to grow up and do the things she want. Its like having a good young pitcher on your baseball team, although you want them to start everygame and carry you to the promise land you just have to be careful about killing them by giving them too many innings. Dont wanna ruin the future by pushing too hard today.
that was retarded
I think it's one of those morality thing America basically imposed on Japan after WW2, but Japan figured out a multitude of ways to circumvent. Gambling is illegal? Ok, instead of winning money, you win little metal balls and, would you look at that, there just happens to be a store that buys little metal balls next door! Oh, prostitution is illegal? Well, these women aren't prostitutes if they are washing you and their sponge of choice just happens to be their bodies.
"normal" people.
Giving car buying advice from a gear head to a "normal" is really hard. Here at college I'm lucky to have a car club where we meet up once a week and spend 2 hours talking about cars. 
Or in the case of \_dbb\_...  *Pop Pop Pop Pop Pop Pop Pop*
*laughs at him again*  Why scared you'll like it?  *She sonidos at him drawing her blade and slashing*
Thanks for having taken the time to reply to me. I've been reading around (I've posted about this on the forums as well) and I'll wait a bit more to see if this gets fixed in the next days. I don't think I'm the only one with the problem.
What strain?
Don't make me shed a tear motherfucker! 
I agree.  There definitely is a debate regarding actual combat effectiveness.  They deal damage at the same speed (shown below), but the Red9 allows for more accurate follow-up shots and conserves ammo.  The Blacktail has higher capacity (but I personally have found that there is little need for capacities over about 20) but also needs it due to the lower damage.  They really are so close in combat capability that it can be a preference (and more importantly, style of play) issue.  Damage per 10 seconds: (this calculation neglects capacity) Red9: 125.0 = [5x(10/0.4)] Blacktail: 125.9 = [3.4x(10/0.27)]  Damage per magazine: Red9: 110 = [5x22] Blacktail: 119 = [3.4x35]  So, they are essentially identical in raw damage dealing capability (the Blacktail only *marginally* outperforms the Red9 in *exceptional* situations, like emptying an entire mag at once).  The Blacktail is going to be better for "Oh Shit" moments due to the rate-of-fire (we must remember that every bullet has the capacity to stagger opponents, regardless of damage dealt).  The vast, vast majority of the game consists of player-initiated and manipulated skirmishes with small numbers of enemies for which both guns will perform almost identically.  Also, conserving ammo is always a concern (at least for me) in RE4, which is why I much prefer the Red9.  The Blacktail requires a steady diet of 47.1% *more* handgun ammunition than the Red9 (and this excludes accuracy issues, where the Red9 is undoubtedly superior; computation obtained by [5/3.4-1]x100).  There is an issue of inventory space, which the Blacktail obviously dominates; but if you have a full inventory, you should have no worries anyway.  For players who rush into combat and virtually seek out "Oh Shit" moments, the Blacktail will serve you better (not hating on this gameplay style, the 'adrenaline' style of play is more fun for some people).  For those who play more strategically (and use the handgun even for mid to long range engagements), the Red9 will be a better option.  For numerical references: http://strategywiki.org/wiki/Resident_Evil_4/Weapons_and_upgrades  This comment until now assumes both guns are fully upgraded.  However, the Red9 is available sooner, allowing you to obtain proficiency with the weapon sooner in the game.  *EDIT: I revoke that last comment because the Blacktail plays almost identically to the handgun and Punisher.  The Red9 plays much differently than the rest, suggesting it has the higher learning curve*  TL;DR: Red9: Range, ammo preservation; Blacktail: CQB.  Both guns will perform equally well under most circumstances, but the player's style of play will determine which gun is better for them.  EDIT: Formatting; added Tl;DR
A Chicago pizza joint? With PPV's every month?  I want to go to this place now.
Did anyone actually read the article?  MSNBC isn't exactly growing either.  The headline is very misleading.
I love how this is the least fucked up story. 
I guess I just wonder if there's a better way to help. I mean, even if the person I give money to spends it on something he needs, what good does a couple bucks really do anyway? I tend to think that its true purpose is to lessen the giver's guilt rather than to actually help the receiver. 
Level up on the elite four (or off wilds in mount silver)?  I definitely struggled through that and defeating Red.  Seemed to be a lot harder than the original G/S/C because they made the E4 stronger after beating them.
Hmm.. I like having one normal-type on my team, but that's just me. I am not a Pokemon master (har-har) but I enjoy having it incase I am weak against a type that my other Pokemon can't handle. 
So many terrifying dicks on 50/50 today.
I REALLY HOPE YOU GUYS SQUEAK IN WITH OR WITHOUT SPEZZA AND KARLSSON. YOU DESERVE TO MAKE IT. DON'T TELL ANYBODY BUT I CHEERED FOR YOU GUYS ON YOUR CUP RUN BEFORE I MOVED TO TORONTO. 
The Lua implementation does not use reference counting for garbage collection. It uses a mark-and-sweep algorithm.
If OP is lying, they pollute the front page and make a fool out of /r/atheism. 
If you really feel this way, best of luck! I hope the new subreddit brings better discussion.  But I disagree. There's usually plenty of very good discussion on this subreddit. Sure, there's some knee-jerk reactions and sometimes its difficult to go against the hivemind. But that happens to every subreddit once it has a fairly large number of subscribers. There are lots of people who regularly contribute here with lots of good content as well as discussion. And some people have worked really hard from day one to make this subreddit a good place, specially the mods (and it is a good place, compared to any other subreddit I can think of, imo).   I'd personally want everyone, specially people like you (sometimes controversial maybe, but atleast you speak your mind and bring your own opinion into the discussion) to stay instead of just walking away.  Personally this whole Rafa thing is kind of stupid. Its really surprising and weird how polarized this sub has become over a silly issue like this. I've never seen anything like this before over here. But in the end we all want him gone, and would have preferred RDM to not be sacked. I think once this issue cools down, this sub will be back to normal as well.  So TL;DR : This subreddit very good. Me like a lot of people here. No go. All people stay. Rafa evil. He go. We live happily ever after.
[Checkmate, atheists.](http://www.reddit.com/r/woahdude/comments/18c5gt/the_worlds_quietest_room_pic/c8do7un)
The Last Swan is amazing for people who are not used to dual analog. Plus it is a great gaming experience to boot. 
If you're referring to rust it didn't look that bad when I looked.  The only really bad stuff I noticed was in the exhaust pipe... which I took a picture of.
I'll give you $20.
I have the scan snap - catching up on old documents is the hardest part!
Cheap way to increase conjuration in a hurry: Find horkers, get them to notice you, keep casting then sheathing bound sword. It counts as using the spell in combat, and since horkers are slow as seven hells, it isn't dangerous and can be infinite. Also, [here](http://elderscrolls.wikia.com/wiki/Fort_Amol) is where you find the Bound Bow spell Tome, which can be a struggle to locate otherwise
Honestly, Joey Bada$$ on 1Train
Another test is a home improvement project. If you can finish without cold cocking your significant other, you're golden.
I'm 23 and I've known since as far as I can remember that I did not want kids.
Flax seed oil/powder. Pretty cheap and lots of fats + fiber. Also, magnesium. 
Did her breasts get bigger in the past month? 
...they can still charge a printing fee  as long as you have the document on your phone you should be able to present it to the ticket takers, I've done that at MSG before
The gulf....
That is absurd and completely unacceptable. Being on time is a basic expectation. It is even more crucial for supervisors to be on time, especially for opening shifts. Quite frankly, your manager is not doing his or her job by letting this go. That supervisor should have been fired a long time ago, so your manager is just as responsible for letting this situation continue. My advice is to call Partner Resources immediately. Keep in mind that you have to provide very accurate information such as specific dates. All the other baristas who were supposed to open with this supervisor should be involved in this complaint as well. Also mention that complaints to the SM and DM have been useless. Also, ask Partner Resources for the contact information of the Regional Director, who is in charge of the DMs and complain to him/her.  But the key is to provide specific dates so that Partners Resources can look at the Time Punch records and verify your claim. I am a manager and this kind poor behavior really irritates me because it makes us all look bad. 
I tried it out on my S2000, held up for a few months. Did it in white though, got dirty really quickly.
If this is really a book, please mail a copy to me.
I agree so much. The title sounds so pretentious but it really does cover an impressive amount of topics. And makes each and every one of them interesting as hell with his personal little stories and funny analogies. Thoroughly enjoyed it!
Gotta say, beats the hell out of finding [this](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/_6eGwSoHeKg8/SwfuUwDj-cI/AAAAAAAACVQ/Rm-od3cgByM/s1600/alg_condom.jpg)
were the Greeks fought the Persians during the battle of Marathon there are I think 3-5 large mounds of were the Greeks just piled the slayed Persians after the battle and just covered them up with some dirt. they still exist. 
That would be pretty cool, wouldn't it?
I'll go back to my hole now...... :(
Yes, but don't tell them. You'll hurt their feelings.
And billions more from Checkbook Zionists. 
Someone forgot to turn off their Instagram filter.
&gt; Because I don't tell people I am a musician, more so- a lyracist, or simply a thought thinker. A modern philosopher. It's all so cloudy, I'm not sure which parts of me are music, and which are not.  Dude, calling yourself a "modern philosopher" makes you sound like you have your head pretty far up your own ass. In fact that whole statement is about as pretentious as it gets. Everyone who writes lyrics is expressing themselves, you don't need to make up some term to try and put yourself on a pedestal.
Wow, he looks 10 year younger without his beard!
I don't think it is. We can't blame them because they want a better life for themselves and their families. But as I said, it doesn't help the local industry.
Dude, mono sucks.  Damned herpesviridae.
how was this taken without dying
&gt;once you download you can keep forever (until your membership ends.)  To add to this, if your membership ends and you decide to turn it back on you get access to your games from the first time you had a subscription as well.
If you actually had this reaction you wouldn't still be here
When I came out of the shadows I was in a San Francisco hospital; brought thither by the captain of the American ship which had picked up my boat in mid-ocean. In my delirium I had said much, but found that my words had been given scant attention. Of any land upheaval in the Pacific, my rescuers knew nothing; nor did I deem it necessary to insist upon a thing which I knew they could not believe. Once I sought out a celebrated ethnologist, and amused him with peculiar questions regarding the ancient Philistine legend of Dagon, the Fish-God; but soon perceiving that he was hopelessly conventional, I did not press my inquiries.
OK, you were awesome to start with, but that right there just takes the cake. You are perhaps the most amazing person in the world, not to mention a hell of a role model.
http://www.reddit.com/r/survivor/comments/19dy9y/a_true_military_survivor/c8nf1u6
I have social anxiety disorder (social phobia) and I tried bringing it up to my parents because I knew it was ruining my life. They told me my problem was nothing compared to my cousin almost burning to death and that I should stop being a wimp. Now I never open up to anyone but the internet.
Depends on the nature of one's addiction. For me, the fapping was almost secondary. It was mostly about the thrill of finding new stuff, or finding old scenes that I remembered from the past, or I would really get into a particular "star" and try to download as much stuff of hers as I could. It was a very obsessive/compulsive type behavior in my case.   If I could have squeezed one off in 5 minutes and then gone and done something productive, then I probably never would've seen myself as having a problem. But for me, it was mostly the searching for new shit that gave me the thrill. There are different types of addiction.
Do you realise what subreddit this is?
I once heard Jews compared to cheap taskmasters, demonstrated through Christopher Columbus.   Context: I was in fourth grade, an we were reading some book about life on Columbus' ships from the point of view of a child. We're discussing Columbus and how he treated his crew, when some kid in class yelps out "He must have been Jewish." My teacher freaked out, sent him to the principal, and pulled me aside after class with the other Jewish students (public school) to make sure we were OK. This was when I learned that ignorance and intolerance are learned attributes, and now I pity close-minded, ignorant adults because they were brought up that way and never had a chance. 
Trout?
damn... my arms would be toast.
All that results in is more suffering and death as more and more people are forced out of seeing a doctor. 
If you were to add the "guns" to servers, only add it to a few of the servers, maybe 2 public ones to get people to try it out. Something that would also have people play in the "vanilla" servers would be to lower the  server capacity. If a server is full, people might go play regular minez, then come back and see if the server now has empty spots. Another temporary addition would be a 5-10min death ban from only the guns server. People wont just sit in the lobby for 5-10 minutes: this would make people play the regular servers and increase server population.
*Lederhosen, fucker
Massachusetts. 
NC have the largest population. Tr have the most when its OPs time or EXE is doing some event. VS have the night owls.  Overall, This server is pretty awesome if only we could get some constant action on Amerish and Esamir.  We seem to love biolab fights... especially stupid scatmaxes. The best 3 ways happen at Crossroads and TI alloys. The best 2 way fights (for me as the TR) happen up in the northwest against NC pushing south.  It used to be us pushing south with VS going North but I imagine I'll be having to find a new favorite place to fight with the next rotation.   VS have the least fun warpgate so I don't really end up fighting them unless they're pushing to our warpgate or they're around Crossroads.   Oh and Terrex doesn't really play much anymore :(.  EDIT: Looking back I did have a pretty awesome fight trying to hold the stronghold vs the VS. May need to do this again.
So was football.  Plenty of professions could have capped salaries.  Most people accept capitalism. The state should never set caps on salaries, especially the performance based elements.
I don't understand why someone thinks watching a movie would cure clinical depression. It may cure 'the blues' or apathy or temporarily help mild depression, but it is sure as hell not going to help someone with clinical depression. With that said, I haven't seen the movie. (Although I think my point stands on its own without the movie.)
That cracked me up.  Hmm..
The NIMBY's didn't want a skytrain line on Arbutus in 2000.  Why should we spend 2.8 billion dollars on them now? http://www.cbc.ca/news/story/2000/07/11/bc_arbutus000710.html
I love bitches with freckles.
Wat. Someone here is trying to get other people involved with something to help our city better, and here you are criticizing them calling them names and doing EXACTLY what you're being a bitch about.  Pull the stick from your own ass before you start bashing others.  Edit: HAHAHA yes! Downvote me and don't even reply with your own retort because you know you've messed up.
Any chance of a pic or vid or gif of you fucking yourself with an inanimate object? Such as hair brush, veggies, candles, etc?
I need some new curses. Care to share some?
Up voted for name.
See, that's where your logic is flawed. Getting stoned, drunk, fat, whatever can, and does, effect others. I would explain it to you but:  1. I'm sure you don't care. 2. If you don't already know it then you probably just refuse to acknowlege the facts.
Interesting.  I guess my beef is with the money that I'm being taxed, it goes towards people who will use it to get high. I don't smoke, nor do I look down on people who do, or do drugs.... but do it on your own dime. So, how do we fix the problem? edit: Not all who receive welfare are druggies or use it for drugs and booze. But how do we target and prevent the ones that do. I'm not in any way, shape or form against welfare for the people who absolutely need it. It just seems a very abused system. 
Oops.
I'm right there with you buddy. That phrase has never made sense to me. 
Well, I have known people who would shank you in the exercise yard to come up with enough scratch to buy their next double-double.
Seriously though, thank you for your help and guidance for all of us.
Still doesn't work. I'm not using RES and I have the subreddit theme enabled. Glad you had fun making it! I'm on google chrome if that matters.
That looks a lot like Constantinople...  Are you sure it's Istanbul, not Constantinople?
Could you remove the "h" at the end of all of your pictures? (For example, http://i.imgur.com/Zw4wUB1h.jpg would go to http://i.imgur.com/Zw4wUB1.jpg, etc.). They aren't working in the database right now, and that will fix it.  Let me know when that's done so I can put your entry back into the database. Thanks!
haha thumps up!!
&gt;The paleo/caveman diet is effective at helping people lose weight.  There. How is that a bad thing?  And seriously, look around you. Look what the wonderful carb-rich diet did to the world. How can people be so blind and still think "well stuffing my face with donuts is surely better than your bacon!". Yeah, you didn't say that, but anyway.  The caveman theory is just one of many things that backs keto. The main thing is that it works. Especially for people who have failed miserably at other diets and especially people who have a problem with moderation. It's simple, it's delicious, there ARE health benefits in the long term (and even if it is just dropping 100 lbs).  So why the fuck are you so angry? What did keto do to you? Why can't you let people enjoy their bacon and drop pounds while doing so?  btw. you started being condescending. if you have nothing nice to say (or at least informative), better say nothing at all
Yeah... thanks for the spoiler. 
So wouldn't it be...   "It was so long and written badly" 
Did the computer come with Windows 7 pre-installed? The answer will affect your activation options.
She gives him a dollar!
11.62 :D edit: nvm 11.76 and it seems the high score
Huh -why do you believe PS4 titles will be more profitable? If anything, I would think *less* profitable because a 2007 game selling for $60 is netting more than a 2014 game selling for $60 when adjusted for inflation.
I know Adelman is good friends with Turner and they've talked about working together, I'd love to see him eventually replace Rick in the future.
Originally submitted [here](/r/LadyBoners/comments/uk98n/ill_just_leave_this_here/) by user [Kabblamm](/u/Kabblamm).
Meh it's back and forth, in total I'd say that every subreddit has there idiots and assholes, this subreddit just gets picked on more because of the sensitive topic.
"Man, that guy is so gay, I think I'm gonna force him to suck my dick! That'll teach *him* what's what!"
In the name of the Tiger, the Bear and the Holy Llama... 
That guy was freaking valourous though, VC or no VC. 
People suck dick for coffee every day.
Thanks for letting me know! I am DYING to try Sonia Kashuk's products, but they are not available in Canada. I only live a couple hours from the border though so I'm hoping to make a weekend trip soon! 
The crazy thing is that there are more people in this picture. This was taken from the giant sound/camera tower in the middle. Anyone know what show this is? Reminds me of Radiohead last year.
Don't know what you're talking about. Sony makes fantastic cameras.
I too am a proud owner of the 800D! Awesome case. 
I didn't know I was so dangerous.
snow queen
Kidd-Gilchrist has this kind of potential IMO
Maybe in your fantasies.
i'd read the silmarillion 3 or 4 times by the time the first movie came out, but i can't recall this story for the life of me. is it in the main text?
Should i encrypt my drive? or i'm kinda new new to the black hat world, and i just want to stay safe.
Everything will be okay in the end, if it's not okay, it's not the end.
One of the Main 6 got horribly scarred when acid was spat in her face in the previous episode, and the rest of them decide to wear masks as well in solidarity.  Sunset Shimmer turns out to be some vapid background pony who's been a hanger-on ever since Twilight became a princess, and she misunderstands this heartfelt gesture to be just the newest fashion craze. Misunderstandings and hijinks ensue.
Reddit is my news source. 
Maybe not in our lifetimes, I'd never want to rule it out though.  Also, [here's an example](http://i.imgur.com/bGRyR5t) of an armed American militia which fought the police and enjoyed widespread public support.
You must have never played the COD series if you think I was acting like a bad person... ;3
yes you have to spend 2100 CP to get the ability to carry5 AT mines ([source](http://planetside.wikia.com/wiki/Engineer) just hover over the pips for the utility pouch)   one thing to note (which is not mentioned on any info text) though is that by increasing the amount of your perfered explosive (c4,AT or AP mine) ALSO increases your maximum amount of them to be actively out (say you have 3 AT mines, you can have 3 AT mines out before they start being replaced)   honestly the utlity pouch is rather useless unless you're using c4 in which case you'd only want the first level and both from c4 itself (700 for c4, 200 for the pouch so 900 CP total) which gives you 3 sticks which IIRC is enough to a sunndy regardless of mineguard or blockade armor ([source in case you wanted it](http://www.ps2calc.com/#vehicle1=Sunderer&amp;vehicle1Upgrade0=0&amp;vehicle1Upgrade1=4&amp;weapon1=C4))  if you use your mines kamikaze style mainly cause 3 mines is usually more than enough and a lot of times you are barely able you drop 3 mines let alone 5, and should that sunndy have mineguard then you either need backup or 3 sticks of expensive c4 (as mentioned earlier)   TL;DR:  don't bother with it unless you're using c4 or you want to be able to set up multiple traps
If I just put my hand over the top half of the photo then that is one delish looking sambo.
Yes.
"/r/NetflixBestOf is not an archive. This means that reposts are not only allowed, but are encouraged to some extent. The front page of this subreddit is meant to be a living representation of quality content on Netflix, which means that sometimes you might see the same submissions multiple times. The mods are leaving it up to the community to utilize downvotes if they feel that reposts are too excessive"
The person who announced this is a *Molyneux*. I don't know how I feel about this.  In all seriousness Sony seems to be making all the right moves in all the right places. This is a machine I can see having for a decade cycle.
They made me raise my hat several times for the picture, now i have a five head.  ha
I smoked and drove sooo much in high school, and now being 22, I look back and think "jesus christ that was so fucking stupid" and would never dream of doing that today.
I just bought a few kanger t2s and some extra coil heads for my twist from wordupecig.com, after a good amount of research they seemed to be the cheapest. Free shipping for all orders and free expedited shipping for an order over 35 bucks. I'm in CA, they're in FL, and I had my package 3 days after ordering (not counting Sunday).   Just a word of advice though, the T2s I used to get from my local B and M seemed to work fine out of the package, so I filled the one I got in the mail straight up with juice and went to vape it and got a huge mouthful of cotton fibers or some shit, then was inhaling some nasty burnt taste for a while. After research, I found out you had to soak the coil heads in hot filtered water for a while then let them dry over night. They worked like a charm after that. 
Do you all remember the post in the Ask a Rapist thread where the guy specifically said he chose women like her? He said he liked women with "issues" because if they spoke out about what he did to them, they wouldn't be believed. He made then targets to abuse this very system because he's a fucking predator, like rapists are.  But sure, let's rally around due process and say that this victim-blaming stuff I necessary to protect against the epidemic of "false rape accusations" and the victims of rape be damned.
Your dad is awesome! you just dont know it yet, wait till you have kids
I downvoted.
Not if it's cheaper. You might as well go with the cheapest unethical and shady provider.
I'm going to return it soon! Thank you! I just wish i could have swatches before buying it. The lady working there was giving me dirty looks because I'm young. Why can't a 14 year old swatch in peace?!
Hm.. interesting. I have reoccurring daydreams as well. Sometimes I dream I invented this iron man looking robot that I can control with my mind. I always think about what I would do..  
I don't know what happened to the KDE screenshot, but it certainly doesn't look like that when you install it. Compared to the other screenshots it looks like it was done on a much smaller screen.
Oh I'm very aroused.
The backpack can't be a sticker if the mannequin's foot is overlapping it.
Anal intruders 2.0: *Dinner edition* 
Tu te trompes. Probablement, tu seras compris si tu utilises l'indicatif mais tu seras tort.  Pense à l'anglais, si tu le parles: "I wish I was an astronaut" n'est pas correcte (ça doit être "I wish I *were* an astronaut") mais l'intention est claire.
You are quite aptly named; you do have a lovely cunt. I would love to see more of it. :)
No it isn't!
I would do unspeakable things for that Baratheon horn.  And toast it with Ours Is The Fury roughly ten times a minute.
That is based entirely on how white people act in your experience and not on how people in general are across the board. Racism and discrimination aren't reserved only for white people to use. Racism is just as common with blacks and all of the other races as well. 
&gt;Besides, that blonde the Wild have is pretty easy to look at anyway.  Granlund?
I love the idea. Might get one. Military, so I may need to pack a month to a year at a time. 
Complain that I talk to loud when I speak louder than a whisper.
I hope this is good.  I think it all depends on how deep they delve into each races culture. 
Haha he actually wasn't acting in it, he was the producer, so he provided everything and had to approve everything :3 No, he is a man that definitely doesn't need makeup.
the three billy goats gruff
you issed.
Oh my god you have a reddit?! I love your videos so much, i've been watching since I started playing and I will continue to watch :D
SParserLogic, you could do what I did and get some people to help you create your own guild, then have one IRL friend join up, make them an officer and then they can invite the rest of your toons to your own private guild. You can then g-kick that IRL friend (or leave them in). Either way you now have your own private guild with 5% xp boost. I do this on the toons I level that I don't want to be in my other guilds.
I thought it was something like "Did you get it?" face people have after they say a bad joke.
Gore...It's beautiful!
I was asking about dogma. 
I thought genesect was like that because of team rocket experiments or something along those lines.
Tell your dad to stop being a pussy and to stick his foot up that guy's ass.
(☉)(☉)
What's that in a unit we can all understand?  ~453kg I am 73kg.  71st for the older Britons.
*Ghastly*
And on Sunday evenings we had "Wonderful World of Disney" movie on CBS if I remember right.
*^^^It ^^^was ^^^a ^^^joke ^^^about ^^^reposts, ^^^guys*
Probably saves them from doing paperwork, I doubt ticketing people for jaywalking is the highlight of their day too. 
Hi, I'm the guy on the far left, one of the owners of a vermont-based Firearm and tactical supply dealership. We had a small photo shoot after a show a couple of weeks ago for some support pictures we were contributing to a local 2A preservation group. And this was one of the slightly silly pictures taken after the photographer said to us, "Okay, and now Jazz Hands!"
Hmm I shall go to Fukuoka instead then.  There's the bonus of being closer to Kansai too.  So that will save me travel time.  I know you guys on this subreddit must hate these kind of questions but what would you recommend visiting/eating in Fukuoka? I'll be there probably 2 full days.
3 people linked the video, and you, the only one with City flair, were also the only one who failed to link the official City channel.
Maybe it's a genetic thing.
Look at OP's pic.
Capitol or lowercase?
First of all - the com"ments reply was mine, not kingofthegoldenhall's, so leave him out of it.  Secondly - if you think that I didn't intentionally add the " to the word comment, then you're a fucking moron.
Did you sing the Golden Ticket song?
Why downvote? I thought it was funny.
Batlefield 2 had this if I'm not mistaken. Also, in Red Orcestra you safe those magezines and when you run out of full magezines it then uses the magezines which are near empty, it then also states if it is a heavy(full), medium(almost full) or light(close to empty).
LFG!
You put your own tone into my comment.  I can't help it that you have an attitude.  here are just a few of the links on the subject from Jewgle. http://www.phogropathy.com/the-very-cliche-railroad-track-shot/  Also, these are better than his and they're STILL cliché.  http://thenucc.deviantart.com/art/Cliche-Train-Tracks-126857435  http://m.flickr.com/#/photos/stevesdigitalimaging/6125333723/
* [Today you, tomorrow me](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/elal2/have_you_ever_picked_up_a_hitchhiker/c18z0z2) * [Jolly Rancher Story](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9wcte/reddit_whats_the_grossestnastiest_thing_thats/c0er6q4) * [It went *okay*](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/fn67j/i_hear_my_house_mate_masturbating_should_i_walk/) * [The cum box](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/t0ynr/throwaway_time_whats_your_secret_that_could/c4imcva) * [They were just wrestling](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/mt4f7/i_am_a_man_who_who_had_a_sexual_relationship_with/)
My friend is the drummer (woody).  I'm sure they would be up for a AmA. I'll fun it past him tomorrow. I'm sure he will have to check with his label first.  Thanks for the idea, I'll let you know!
*This conspiracy's context:* **[A gynandromorphic cardinal, one half of its body is male, the other half female.](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/19ercx/a_gynandromorphic_cardinal_one_half_of_its_body/)**  ^Did ^the ^bot ^make ^a ^mistake? [^Message ^me](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=KarmaConspiracy_Bot&amp;subject=Error:\%2019ffbb&amp;message=Post\%20in\%20question:\%20http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/19ffbb/redditor_uses_bleach_to_make_cardinal_look_like_a/\%0A\%0ACorrect\%20link:\%20) ^with ^the ^correct ^link ^- [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/uu43r/rkarmaconspiracy_bot/)
mmm where do i apply?
Can't be worse than Borgia.
I think you've been creeped on by Ras Al Ghul.
amazing name
Plus, the amount of rage-quits would've been increased by 463%.
Most of them probably hadn't read the Bible either. They only knew the carefully curated parts that they were spoon-fed as part of the Sunday services. That's pretty typical.
I'll add my OWN residue, thank you very much... 
How's port been?!
I've heard similar from former IT staff there.
Funnily enough, it doesn't remind me of Doctor Who that much. Well it reminds me of classic Who, not new Who (even though 11 and 10 show up in different eps). The story with the Judoon is hilarious. There are funny scenes in that.  And Sarah-Jane Smith? The show is just so great because of her. I swear, what a great role-model. I wanted to go out to the store and buy vests like hers just because of that show. That *never* happens to me.
Thatsthejoke.png
I linked it in the subreddit already, but I made a .gif of Travis from this episode  [http://i.imgur.com/9v38o2z.gif](http://i.imgur.com/9v38o2z.gif)
What?
The Catholic Church works in mysterious ways.
Absolutely inhabitable (or habitable, I guess they mean the same thing). There is a chance that one of the moons of either Jupiter or Saturn (or both) have life.  Plants and animals need energy but not necessarily the sun.   In any case, unless the planet's tilt is very near 0% relative to the solar plane and the moon rotated directly around the equator of that planet, the moon would not be out of sunlight for nearly as long as you imagine.   Think about how infrequently we have lunar eclipses (earth between the sun and the moon) and how brief they actually are for some sense of this.  Edit: Saved, looked at inhabitable and then second guessed my wording so added the habitable comment.
There are always silly people in every belief system.   They don't realise that they are just as blind and unaccepting of the beliefs of others as the radical theists they are attacking.   Silly, silly people. 
http://i.minus.com/igk1jitHeOiTC.gif
I had an experience somewhat similar to this today. My boyfriend woke up for a quicky and got a little too rough. He ended up ripping my earring out. I bled all over our brand new white sheets, passed out, and then threw up when I woke. Worst experience of my life. 
Him slamming his head off the keyboard after the 50th lame injury joke might constitute a real injury. 
Typical atheists. Always hurting people and eating babies.
&gt; Democrats in Kansas were unable to kill a Republican  WUT.
I don't really know much about you (Marr), but I heard an instrumental track of yours where you're just shredding on an electric guitar and I wish I knew what song that was and if I can buy it on iTunes.
downvote for even asking 
Luckily it's on my arm. Rescheduling might be a problem, since my artist is fully scheduled 14-15 months ahead.
How is this adding to the subject in even the slightest?
That's some highly sophisticated mining equipment right durr  In other words, looks great, although doesn't really match the NC heavy. It's so smooth compared the rest of their gear. 
Guide to XBOCT: get amazing farm, buy things, press buttons, die.
You want to discuss better the difference in beliefs. Well, you believe in a god(s) and atheist don't. I would start by providing proof or a description of the god you believe in. Then communication could potentially open pending a subject.  Also, there isn't a "belief" structure to atheism, it is simply the rejection of the proposal of a god in existence.
Dude, you can't go "2 + 2 = 5. Apart from when it doesn't" and then claim you're not saying 2+2=5. Indeed, such retroactive small printing is written into the law as being illegitimate. So just own up to the fact that you fucked up.
Well I guess I should take a tolerance break then, thanks for the info!
flea products only last a month, you need to re apply every month. You will need to keep re applying for the next few months until all larvae and eggs die off. The eggs can stay in "stasis" for a long time depending on season and the coocoon larvae can lay dormant for more than a year and then suddenly infest again. You can bomb the whole house but unfortunately it is not guaranteed you will kill them all :( 
As of 00:00 GMT on 1 March, you must give $732.50 to doctors without borders. Good luck with that. 
he must work at zumiez
&gt;you've got one man who's entire life has just been a wrecking ball to those around him, all because his Mother left to be a hippie.  An insightful indictment of an entire generation of self-centered hippies who destroyed themselves and their loved ones through rampant narcissism.
In an entirely un-technical approximation; a switch is like a bridge that has more than 2 interfaces.
Damn man that shit looks delicious!
Offense  * 4 points for every Goal ALL * 1 point for every Power Play Point ALL * 10 points for every 8 Short Handed Points (1.25 per) ALL * 2 points for every Assist ALL * 1 point for every 4 Shots On Goal (0.25 per) ALL * 1 point for every 10 Penalty Minutes (0.1 per) ALL * 1 point for every Plus Minus C, LW, RW, D  Defense  * 6 points for every 15 Hits (0.4 per) ALL * 6 points for every 15 Blocks (0.4 per) ALL  Goaltending  * 6 points for every Win G * -3 points for every Loss G * 3 extra points when total Shutouts is exactly 1 G * 3 points for every 10 Saves (0.3 per) G * -1 point for every Goal Against G
That's the only detail. The color. Otherwise, it's the exact model, features, everything she wanted.
He's also a phenomenal father...or at the very least a phenomenal impregnator. 
That is awesome! I love stories like that. Giving away black pearls is no joke! 
*...  it surely must be impossible to absolutely rule out some sort of unknown being that started the universe (god).*  Yeah, it is. And it's easy.
I forget to water them for weeks at a time, and I feel bad so I give them extra water to make up. It doesn't work that way? 
Looks like you had some stretch marks in the first photo, As someone with them at the moment have they faded at all?
Suddenly Avs fans are bashing old faithful Ryan, Calgary fans are flipping shit because Feaster lost their 1st, and other teams are congratulating Colorado.
I would say few are. Those are some of the best.
I think it's because of what makes One Piece the best: the amazingly well-constructed stories sprinkled with awesome characters and actions, where as in Bleach/Naruto's case (more so in Bleach's case) yes the story was there, but as it went on, it just seems like the mangaka can't get a handle on the huge casts and the world he created and the story begins to lose focus. The anime then become a lot less engaging with a lot of plot holes, turning to be mainly about the fighting, the special skills, flashy visuals, another abruptly-appeared-super-strong enemy..etc. Those things can more easily draw people in, but doesn't retain the same interests/love as One Piece, excluding the very loyal fans or teens that only like awesome fights and pretty graphics. I was one of those people sadly, I liked the cool skills and visuals, was in love with Bleach and Naruto from the very start (when they first come on jump), and couldn't bother with this "pirate king" manga because the characters and art style just doesn't look as cool. I gave it a try when I have no other manga to read and after the Arlong arc I'd begun to love it, and now it's my absolute favorite on-going manga. TL;DR One Piece is the best because of its stories which takes time to get into, Naruto/Bleach and most other manga/anime focus more on fancy shit which people get into more easily. (Only follow both anime/manga for One piece, for naruto/bleach I've only read manga, feel free to correct me if I have some misinterpretation on them in anime)
It's like how you used to find "I love how the top comments are exactly the same" as both top comments on youtube, with the exact same amount of thumbs.
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: Halfway through doing laundry when this happened... &gt;Meme: Foul Bachelor Frog &gt;* COMPANY COMING OVER  &gt;* PICK OUT FRESHEST SMELLING CLOTHES FROM DIRTY LAUNDRY &gt;^〘[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3t6oes.jpg)〙 ^〘[Background](http://imgur.com/9NsbX)〙 ^〘[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||COMPANY+COMING+OVER+-+PICK+OUT+FRESHEST+SMELLING+CLOTHES+FROM+DIRTY+LAUNDRY)〙 [**Why?**](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) ┊ [More Info](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/) ┊ AMA: [Bot](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/), [Human](http://www.reddit.com/r/InternetAMA/comments/12gog9/i_am_the_creator_of_qkme_transcriber_a_definitely/)
House looks great regardless really impressive work, great job.
I've probably spend close to $5000 on meat pies in the past 20 years. Im gunna sue!
I also try to spread this [video](http://youtu.be/6wXkI4t7nuc) as much as I can to people. The second half of the video is an investigator admitting to the class that the professor is correct.
Jesus Christ, you self-righteous goons, all he's saying is don't be the next person to fall off a balcony and die. Lighten up.
I think the strength of the Lightning is not only that it is a cheaper tank, but it requires less people to meet is fullest potential. A HE lightning is a frightful presence if used correctly against infantry, and even a HEAT Lightning can be trouble.  MBT's are good, but to meet their fullest potential they really require a crew of two with decent secondary weapons and certs.
Not that I'm your daddy, but I wouldn't run them on that same breaker if having them both on at the same time would trip it. You're just asking for some kind of trouble and a lost crop.   My $.02. Just wouldn't want you to burn the place down.
/r/ramen
He's next right?
6 is generous.
The horror of premades.
If it works for Jesus it works for tapes.
Don't forget he wrote it in German.
Clean your nails
potato patato
Technically it doesn't mean that it can't access the hard drive. It means that it can't find a bootable system volume. The drive may be fine; it's possible the Directory got corrupted or the OS is damaged.
it was prior to seperating, i havent seen the dog since to be able to take a picture
To be fair , properly made pho should be so full of flavour and umami that msg is un-needed.
[Right?](http://i.imgur.com/y5QZ9.gif)
I love the commitment to that gif, the sunglasses had a shadow coming down.
Both. I watched the movie first, though
I'm pissed off, I did NOT want to be on the North American Marlon Brando Look Alikes Mailing list.  I hardly look like the guy.
Thanks for the advice :)
Glad I can help my fellow man. 
[And the original of the last frame](http://pbfcomics.com/223).
The product key on the bottom of the PC is generic. 9 times out of 10 it won't even activate windows, you can probably call and that might work but don't worry about that. This is getting a little advanced but I will explain it simply without going into a lot of detail. Each OEM PC has a marker in the BIOS called a SLIC table. The OEM (Dell, HP, Fujitsu, Acer, etc) when they develop the BIOS for that particular board do a process called tattooing, this process puts markers in the BIOS so that when they install windows it will automatically activate out of the box and never need reactivation as long as you never change the BIOS of the board. Now its possible to flash one of these tables into your BIOS but I won't go into that here.   Now depending on the OS that the machine came with the process for activation is different. Windows Server 2003/XP (Windows NT 5) use a process called SLP 1.0 to check for activation, the downside to this is that you need OEM media, and an OEM key because the files that check for SLP activation are not present in retail or VL media. So you can't convert an existing install over to an OEM install without some work. Well this all changed with Windows Vista and beyond (Windows NT 6), up until Windows 8 and Server 2012. With Vista MS changed the method to look for newer parts in a SLIC table and then tied this to a certificate that was issued to the large scale OEM and then used a generic key to activate windows. This was a lot easier because you can convert any install (except Enterprise) to OEM, Retail or VL (in the case of Professional) as long as you have the markers in your BIOS and a corresponding certificate that matches the SLIC table. Windows 8 is a lot more involved because of the amount of people that activated Windows 7 using SLIC loaders.   Now back to your problem. First step is to identify the version of Windows the machine came with.   If it came with XP then you need an OEM XP disk, it has to be OEM and you need the OEM key to install from that media. It can be any OEM media as long as its OEM is all we care about. Once you get done installing Windows you need to find a utility called [OEMScan] (http://www.msfn.org/board/topic/82638-oemscan-automated-multi-manufacture-pre-activation-utility/), then get the OEMBios files from [OEMBIOS.net](http://www.oembios.net/) and replace those files with the one from Toshiba. If the tables match the next time you reboot Windows it will be activated. If not then you will need to get the correct OEM BIOS files from the restore media then copy them out of Windows once it is installed, then you can reinstall a clean copy of Windows without all the OEM junk.   If you have Windows Vista then you just need to find an untouched copy of [Windows Vista SP2](http://forums.mydigitallife.info/threads/23379-Windows-Vista-SP2-Retail-amp-VL-mirror-link!!!). Once you get that installed you need to use [OPATool] (http://forums.mydigitallife.info/threads/7126-The-Official-Windows-7-Repository/page23?p=149816#post149816) to install the cert and license key for your edition.  If you have Windows 7 then you just need to find an untouched copy of [Windows 7 SP1](http://forums.mydigitallife.info/threads/28517-Windows-7-w-o-SP1-and-SP1-Media-Refresh-Direct-Download-Links). Use [OPATool] (http://forums.mydigitallife.info/threads/7126-The-Official-Windows-7-Repository/page23?p=149816#post149816) to do all the heavy lifting of installing the cert and key for your edition and you are ready to go. 
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: I go to LSU and had a girl say this when I told her we are reading parts of the bible in my fiction class. &gt;Meme: Sheltering Suburban Mom &gt;* WHY WOULD IT BE IN FICTION CLASS  &gt;* THE BIBLE IS 100% TRUE &gt;^〘[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3t6of1.jpg)〙 ^〘[Background](http://imgur.com/R8Vz9)〙 ^〘[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||WHY+WOULD+IT+BE+IN+FICTION+CLASS+-+THE+BIBLE+IS+100%25+TRUE)〙 [**Why?**](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) ┊ [More Info](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/) ┊ AMA: [Bot](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/), [Human](http://www.reddit.com/r/InternetAMA/comments/12gog9/i_am_the_creator_of_qkme_transcriber_a_definitely/)
Yep that would be either let go or heavily distrusted by the boss. I would go with the " she was a step child, but now divorced"  thing to get out of it. or if you are committed get a picture of a relative's kid or a relative as a kid and use that. it will have resemblance, and you can use stories that will sound more true because they have truth in them.
We didn't do so well [with the last guy who made prop bets](http://www.reddit.com/r/MLS/comments/13z0eo/i_am_willing_to_bet_anyone_anything_that_the/) so I'm a little hesitant about this.
That girl wants the D
What are you weighing?
You become part of the old Conference USA.  So welcome back for you, I guess.
You know, I thought about going outside today to see the beauty that mother earth bestows....Things change
I wonder how many of your upvotes come from people who pirate music and movies.
Times new Roman... please dont
This was done in a place in Kansas that used to live. They simply called it a Pizza Taco and it was freaking awesome! Pratt, KS to be exact.
[Here's](http://www.flickr.com/photos/theotter/2677635854/sizes/o/in/photostream/) the source.  Acadia, one of the only and the oldest National Park east of the Mississippi, takes up a large portion of Mount Desert Island, where the regions of Midcoast Maine and Downeast meet in Frenchman's Bay, near the mouth of the Penobscot River. It was founded in 1919, and contains impressive granite cliffs, a huge variety of animals and plants, and the tallest mountain (Cadillac) on the North American Atlantic coast.  It's the most beautiful place I've ever been in my short life, and I feel it gets overlooked by bigger Western parks, so I wanted to share some love.
Zion spartan is the worst player in LCS by far
The Prayer- Kid Cudi
&gt;she is pretty vocal about not liking most black men and women she comes across.   &gt;I can't stand bigotry.  Good luck with that.
http://www.realmeye.com/top-mystics  Looks fairly equal.
This. 
I cant believe you guys are missing the obvious here:   DENNIS RODMAN: UNDERCOVA 'MURICAN BROTHA
yes but what im saying is the line between 'amateur' and 'professional' is much more blurred in music than it is in science, since science deals with objective facts, and music is highly subjective.  if 'professional' simply means making a career out of music, then justin bieber, lil wayne, soulja boy, these people could be considered great examples of 'professional musicians'.  the point is, in an objective field like science, the top 'professional' scientists all have one thing in common - they are DAMN good at science. in a subjective field like music, the top 'professional' musicians are nothing more than a social litmus test, and not always inherently skilled musicians.
I'm more excited about the sudden drop of Brazilians on the NA server.
Skinned bear corpses look like human remains
Oh hey, I live in Rochester, but U of R is fucking expensive.
You're not from Kansas are you? we're all poor and most of those cooking meth are on welfare. But go ahead and sit on your high horse, image that all the drug doers in America are the rich elitist snobs and that Democrats are not protecting drug users to gain votes. sure, that has nothing to do with it.
Yeah well I'm studying philosophy at Uni, and I'm willing to give understanding it a lot of effort. I'm also open to the fact he plays around with words a lot, redefining them within the text? or some such. I've read a short intro essay on him, but that's all. Anyway I'm up for it.
To be frank, it's because most people on the internet have no idea what any of those things are let alone what the Shariah is. Again, i see a lot lay Muslims disillusioned with history and any time they find some thing they disagree with, they start talking about the some mystical perfect State. What we don't realize is that, Allah (swt) has provided us with guidance and structure but we are limited by our human capacity. There have been times in history where rulers have implemented Shariah law to the best of their ability and in those times the Islamic empire flourished. What some Muslims fail to understand is that Shariah is not something written in stone where there is a bunch of rules and laws to implement. It's a fluid system that was adapted differently through out history. Unfortunately, since there hasn't been a Calipha for almost 200 years, this system stopped developing.
Or exercise daily, and put a clean towel on your pillow every night
[Too Soon](http://www.iruntheinternet.com/lulzdump/images/gifs/feelings-LA-Noire-stairs-fall-roll-1353404753B.gif)
this is too simple; publishers want to milk you every which way and devs have to enforce that will.  also im pretty sure we're going to be bombarded with loading screen/area ads
Honestly I feel like using GPS navigation with Glass while driving would be even safer than using a dash mounted phone or GPS device, because it's transparent and you don't need to look away from the road to check the directions.
haha that's effing awesome. I love the shirt 'cuz I love T-rex's but it's like it was destined for you!
You stay classy.
jpegadapter.quality=0.0001%
I'll take the bottle and pistol
Giving head somewhere.
I doubt Minette would be allowed as a courier.  Leviathan as a hook for pudge would probably be too similar to Dragonclaw hook, shield might work for DK.
My SU-152 is fully upgraded, I was just curious about your preference. GAWSH.
Can confirm. Ive had those shitty glasses, and now have a nice ass pair of Raybans. oh my god Raybans are amazing
[](/sbflip) It's official: I'm the Plounge's bike.
Oh yeah, I know, my friend runs a production company, he uses yorkville subs and qsc tops
No, because we have given ourselves the right not to be killed at any time. If for example, we said it was OK for Joe to be killed in his sleep then there is nothing to stop it from happening to us. So we make it a law to protect ourselves. At least that's the way I see it. You could also look at it that we all have a desire to keep living and thus should have a right to do so, but killing someone in their sleep is denying them that right. Well if you look at ethics itself there are two major ethical frameworks, a utilitarian framework which says that what we do should reduce suffering and increasing happiness and the otherframe work is a rights based framework where we determine a set of rights we think people should have based on concepts of fairness and justice. In reality peoples personal morales tend to be a combination of those two things. Anyway, I'm rambling again. I understand if you think I'm full of shit.
Well, I would say perhaps you'll want to take a look to see what's going on there.  It's entirely possible that the fan wasn't seated properly, or wasn't connected to the right header.  If you had it shipped to you, it's very possible that it's become unseated.  I would recommend getting some thermal compound from a local store (Arctic Silver 5 is good and fairly cheap) and just re-mounting the heatsink to make sure it's seated well.
Do it. You need to do it man. Don't let her do that to you brother. 
Doomsday told me they're allowed to reply to comments but not make posts themselves   Edit: seems I was mistaken! My bad, sorry! 
I usually have to buy my own Christmas presents and that's how I got a clairsonic for Christmas.  Which would of course mean that if I return it I can get something else while I'm there.  Except this year hubby stepped up and got me an awesome present, so I guess when I return it I will restrain myself.
Only men can be pedophiles silly!
from what i have seen mostly standard, that doesnt mean it wont find a place or be used in modern. in fact i would estimate that over time it will become very strong in modern
Yes! the same thing happened in my game last night after I installed the new patch. I wonder if it is PlantSim related?
Remind me never to have you as spouse or parent. Also, where do you live? I'd like to rob you
Are you THE Epoch?
Florida 
My mom and my dad had sex while I was a baby in my crib next to them.
No, OF the civil war. Missouri fought with the south. Sorry, that is part of your heritage and defines a LOT in culture to this day.
It's about time. I live in a small town of around 15-20000 people. We have an incredible amount of lowlife drug addicts and general human garbage living on welfare (SSI). There are some 3 and 4 generation welfare families that I know of. All are worthless. Most are fully capable of finding and doing a job but won't because they are getting a check each month for free. Most have never even paid a cent into Social Security in their lives. I am all for drug-testing welfare (SSI) recipients because at least in my town many fakers and losers would be removed from the system. If you don't want to get a job and support yourself so you can live, then I would like to see you starve to death as an object lesson the rest. And make the drug tests a real surprise so there is no faking it. Do it like they did in the military. I had to stand there while some guy actually watched the piss come out of the end of my penis and go into the bottle.
mate, time to log off reddit, switch off that screen, and go outside. where you will meet more amazing and nice ppl than you can handle
What is your price range and what style will you want to play?
'Cause most of them are old and have never even touched a videogame.
I did not want to accept that some people actually think I am nice. I have had [hypengyophobia](http://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/hypengyophobia) for many years and I have always thought I was not good enough for anything and just a failure and redused to change my opinion on that. I find that it is still hard to accept very often.
I've got the last two covered.  I've never lost a sock in my current washer/dryer combo, and I own a heat gun (but you can use a hair dryer).
Thank god I'm on my phone and they won't load. How bad were they?
get a chopstick and a hammer  stick the chopstick in the hole and start hammering till the broken headphone jack comes out the other side of the laptop
That sounds cool and messed up. But I feel like somehow that would be abused.
Something had to be done about Winnipeg, and the league took the opportunity to fix some of the weird alignments in the Western Conference. Playing at 10 as opposed to 9 is a huge difference. Especially when you're expected to make that trip multiple times a year, as opposed to just once, for every single team out on the west coast. Nothing can be done about the distribution of teams across the U.S., teams will always be more heavily concentrated on the east coast. That being said, it makes way more sense to have the Western Conference span across 3 time zones as opposed to 4. Being that Detroit and Columbus are the only two EST teams in the Western Conference, it makes all the sense in the world to bring them into the East. 
Saw it live last year. I remember getting goosebumps from the sea of lighters.
I actually learned how to "thread" a projector from one of the managers there as part of "cross training" in case there was ever some kind of emergency or lack of coverage.  They normally had 2 projectionists at the place I worked at.  After learning I never did get to do it.  The biggest bitch thing I saw though was when the bulb went out....mid show and they would have to put on all kinds of protective clothing to get the thing out and a new one in because the thing was hot as hell.  After watching that I was glad I was in Security when those calls came in.  
trade out half the sauce for salsa or barbecue sauce.  Adjust toppings accordingly to fit the theme. Alternately, place a second thin crust pizza with its own toppings over the first and reduce the heat/increase the time you cook it at a bit to compensate.  
I believe i saw "LOL YOLO" somewhere in mr deleteds comment.
you should be an example for all atheists.
Haha, I'm glad someone mentioned it. I meant to in the descriptions but forgot.
That isn't how I've seen it anywhere either, I was just spitballing how it might be workable.
Side?  I am on nobody's side, because no one is on my side.  -Treebeard The Two Towers
i dont look at god as a man in the sky or a man or anything like that. i keep searching for definitions of atheism and there are ton of views towards it which is the base for the confusion. i tell you there is a god, you do not believe me hence you do not believe there is a god. you are going to try to say, no i just dont believe you. well then what is your opinion on god? you dont believe what other people say? that is not an opinion. you either believe it, you dont believe it, or you are skeptical. and the skeptical opinion is agnostic not atheist, people are saying that agnostic is a adjective to go on either theist or atheist and that is incorrect. There is one side, another side, and a middle. Not just two sides, i am not saying i know what you believe because everyone believes different things but the true atheist does not believe there is a god. I came here looking for an atheists opinion not an agnostic opinion.
Me.
I also recommend Sound Shapes. Just got to playing it this week and it's fucking amazing! Thanks for working on the game man!
Ugh, dude... Well she obviously wasn't that great of a catch...
Hooah! Whiskey Company! Over.
Sorry I annoyed you with my friendship.   ^ this one is guaranteed to be correct
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ARDhJ2dpuYU
Samsies
Give me your tired and your poor...
My parents have a home in Colorado, and whenever we buy eggs up there,  the majority of the eggs from the dozen are double yolked.
UEFI and secure boot are not bad things. They are great things. They become bad when manufacturers such as Microsoft use them as a tool for vendor lock in.
added for spycicle
Well DBZ is considered one of the best manga of all time &gt;_&gt; Plus, it's more like DBKai since all the action is significant and advances the plot as well...
u r 1 cheeky kunt m8 
Hahah, yeah, if I'm lucky :P! 
Great job and initiative!
&gt;Thankfully, EULA's, so far, haven't held up in court.  Really?
Yes. Saturday night going into Sunday night.  The temple burns on Sunday night.
but if you have this on then its never neccesary to even block anyone so it doesnt matter if theres a limit
In middle school, this guy I knew said that he didn't like the taste of his girlfriend's vag so he inserted starbursts and sucked them out. One time he forgot how many he put in and she went to the hospital for a yeast infection.
this is completely expected and actually not as bad as it could have been. Many reports were saying St Louis and others would be leaving the A-10 for the new conference as well. With Temple and Charlotte already leaving to other conferences, holding on to St Louis is HUGE for the A-10 staying a top conference.  I'd expect the A-10 to try to pick off Creighton, Siena, Niagra and/or Drexel in response.   edit: *the Catholic 7 schools are also expected to add Creighton, Dayton and St. Louis in 2014 for a 13-team league.* nevermind!
I had actually thought it was stomach cancer that threatened Mary, which shows how well my knowledge of her is holding! But I think I'm right in saying that beyond that she suffered from a range of other maladies that contributed to her decline beyond that cancer, some of which may have themselves caused Mary to believe herself pregnant.
He caves and passes liberal bills like the Medicaid Expansion bill because he's not a conservative, he's a moderate.  Can't get a conservative bill passed?  Have to abandon conservative principles to get a deal done?  That's okay with Chris Christie.  Moderate, maybe even Liberal at times.
It's true in Florida.
http://imgur.com/gaymlJW  my girlfriend and I took a set of jenga blocks and etched in the word "truth" or "dare" into the blocks, and a number that corresponded with either the truth sheet or dare sheet.  each sheet was a list of truths or dares... all of them mildly humorous on paper, but devastating in reality. Questions like: "when was the last time you faked an orgasm, if you haven't or can't recall, fake one now."   or   "what's the strangest thing you've ever masturbated with, if nothing unusual, smell the finger of every person in group and describe the smell."   Dares like "Demonstrate your favorite sexual position with the person on your left."   or   "Let DeadSeaGulls tattoo your right thigh." (I have almost no tattoo experience.) Among the truths and dares there were 5 group choice in each category. Any truth or dare could be declined by a shot, and if anyone intentionally knocks over the tower they have to lick the left nipple of all same sex players until the nipple is erect.   Loser has to take a shot and do a group choice dare. This game nearly broke up 3 couples.  in the picture above, the girl eating the sunchip out of my ass is the guy on the rights girlfriend.   The questions were too real. too raw. resulted in people walking out of the room. but at the same time it was like a train wreck, they kept coming back.  At first you decline so many of them by taking a shot... but after 7 shots.... you're answering what the sluttiest thing you've ever done was, right next to your girlfriend, who decided that she's going to TRUTHFULLY answer the last time she faked an orgasm... shit was brutal.  everyone ended up naked and in the snow.  all relationships still in tact, but in the way that people who survive a disaster sometimes stay in touch.   **TL;DR**: Truth or Dare Jenga, Adult Edition.  **EDIT** Posted rulesheet, blocks, and truth and dare sheets  [HERE](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/19g03f/as_requested_truth_dare_jenga_adult_edition/)   **EDIT 2**  GOLD!! thanks!!!
&gt;I'm also fairly convinced Benson Henderson puffs on occasion.   There is close to a 0% chance that is true.
[Clarks Bushacre Lo Oxford](http://www.jcpenney.com/dotcom/clarks-bushacre-mens-lo-oxford/prod.jump?ppId=pp5001200086&amp;searchTerm=clarks+lo&amp;dimCombo=null&amp;dimComboVal=null&amp;catId=SearchResults)
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 7 months | [Stenzy](/user/Stenzy) | [Hairless Bear](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/vyb7q/hairless_bear/) | [/r/WTF](/r/WTF) | 49 | 232 1 year | [cromulency](/user/cromulency) | [Hairless Bear](http://www.reddit.com/r/awwwtf/comments/q4fx3/hairless_bear/) | [/r/awwwtf](/r/awwwtf) | 18 | 165 1 year | [askiland](/user/askiland) | [Hairless Bear. DO NOT WANT](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/q45zy/hairless_bear_do_not_want/) | [/r/WTF](/r/WTF) | 658 | 986 * See **27 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/pics/comments/19fed1/picture_of_my_95_year_old_grandma/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id 19fed1&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/19fed1/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id 19fed1&amp;message=Have you read the FAQ? Please specify the error.[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/19fed1/\) 'Help me grow')
I always pretended I was Samus.
see what i mean?
&gt;&gt;"Because other big media innovations didn't occur as a result of people taking things without purchasing a license."  &gt;Actually, yes they did. You can argue till you're blue in the face about whether piracy is right, but you cannot tell me that it hasn't been effective.  You said "...that if these companies don't change their merchandising method they will die, the same way it happened for every other big media inovation."  I said that that piracy of media is not way it has has happened, and that it is a modern phenomenon.  Then you counter argue by citing your claim of modern piracy as evidence of it always being the case? Okay. That's the equivalent of saying that super-teams like the Lebron James Miami Heat are not a new phenomenon, and citing the Lebron James Miami Heat as proof of that. Strong work.  &gt;Piracy is the only tool that we have against big media to force them into changing, because they sure as hell won't do it on their own (DRM being one negative example that piracy fought against in the music scene).  This assumes that you have a ***right*** to these things.  You do not.  Is the *only* way to convince a parking lot to lower their fees to park there and not pay? Is the *only* way to get my coworker to give me access to his computer files that he refuses to give me access to to hack into his computer? No.  Why? because I don't have a *right* to these things.  If music, movies, games, etc. are too expensive for my preference, then I can not purchase them, right? I don't personally give a shit if you pirate things or not, but can you please explain to me how things not being in your price range makes it okay to access without permission?
We could just move to china, they build their pollution factories before even getting approval ;P
Probably because it doesn't render judgment until the last possible minute after the funds cannot be reversed and it has to choose whether to complete the transaction or not?
hi!
What did I just watch?
That actually looks really nice. Would you mind making a post on here when it's optimized for 6.1.2? Thanks!
I didn't think my brows could look like that. But, I think everyone has some sort of brow envy lol. Just gotta rock what ya' got (:
Well its a quote from Workaholics.
They don't think they're better than us, they know they are.
Well, aren't we civil!? :)
Totally off subject, but when leaving Sam's once, I found a huge thing of blueberries right outside the door. I looked around and couldn't find anyone missing them, so I took them home!
Saw the title and was Taylor Swift and Nicholas cage? Wtf? Watched it and busted out laughing! Not at all what I expected. 
Theodore Bundy
Thx for sharing.  General rule of thumb I've found is to avoid "CCs" altogether based on the country you're in (shithole vs. Solid).  As such I've seen the horrible floor sweeping CCs in Mexico and Bahamas.  Honduras definitely fits this bill.  They don't always need to be from a LCDH to be real, but if a Cohiba Esplendido costs anything less than 30 USD it's probably fake.  Those and the infamous glasstop cohiba boxes.
Blog named after a movie that only came out a few months ago? Description saying "brain droppings of a formerly employed videogame ninja"? Did they fire CliffyB?  [Oh, right!](http://epicgames.com/community/2012/10/cliff-bleszinski-departs-epic/)  &gt;when Valve charges 100$ for an engagement ring in Team Fortress 2 it’s somehow “cool” yet when EA wants to sell something similar it’s seen as “evil.”   Oh, [don't get me started…](http://www.reddit.com/r/Games/comments/19bu6c/in_light_of_ingame_microtransactions_i_miss_horse/c8my5xn?context=3)
Thank you but, people without any finger movements can major in computer engineering or computer science right?
I ate at a Roly Poly today!  ^_^
I did, theres nothing in there about apps. I thought this community would be helpful, but I guess not. I'll look somewhere else, thanks for nothing.
Maybe you're dreaming this.
Well if you compare Glass to a tablet or a computer, then it's almost justifiable to require a tethering plan. What is really bullshit though (if this is really true) is that AT&amp;T wants to charge you for data used on Glass when you've already paid to **tether** Glass to your phone which already has a 5gb data plan.
Another good reason for people to stay home when they are ill. Whatever he has, I don't want it, and I don't want to encounter the aftereffects, either.
I'd prefer vagina skin tones but hey, whatever floats your boat
Looks to be a caucasian woman, approx 50-60 years old
Just keep doing the same runs bigger and faster every time. If you mess up think why did you mess up. Snowboarding is all about how you throw your body around. As far as starting out with boxes. Try the wide easy ones at a chill speed. Keep your weight centered and BEND YOUR KNEES! standing straight up means that any twitch of the board and you're toast 
(OC) lol get it??
The American Medical system is a corrupt sewage dump of public money paying for private profit.  All the money the US spends on medicare and medicaid would get every single American the best health care in the world in any other country. This doesn't even include the money Americans waste on health insurance premiums, co-pays, and prescription drug bills.  You guys are getting rammed so hard and not doing a thing about it.
I don't mind it when I mix a tiny bit with my regular foundation. I use it on work days mostly but I definitely prefer Laura Mercier for TM. 
I really want to see that.
Youre welcome! Glad I could brighten your day :)
Could also be they don't have automation for specific blocks of information. We have 10 blocks of information, which needs to be distributed to 100,000 places, each with a specific office. Cheapest materially would be to build a system to to burn whatever each needs on however many CDs it takes. But.. on the other hand, the current system can bulk-burn CDs and there is a slew of people doing jack-all. So another option is to bulk-burn however many are needed of each (fairly quick) and then tell people to sort them.
Fair enough.  I just don't agree that she can be mad when most people are aware that lgbt go against Christian beliefs.
Not very well known at all. Maybe in calligraphy circles.
Poorly? Looks like it was a pretty successful throw to me.
No, I'm in my mid-20's
Thats what im doing this week :D
How did they manage to snag a picture of my penis...
Did you manage to break any legs?
Yes that is so hot 
Yup
&gt;  I'm not even sure why feminists trivialize false rape reports   I think we all kinda know the answer to this. Feminism is a political ideology. It doesn't actually care about the welfare of women.
Why is this happening?
If I could just have the sticker comes off cleanly, then i'd find true happiness.
Sounds like she didn't act very well either!
a vagina
No no, I just mean a sadistic creator does not imply that the universe is in someone nonsensical. The universe is (relatively) orderly. 
we must have much higher requirements of police here in Canada, because it seems so foreign to outright spew hatred at them.
I apologize for my ignorance, but what is Skullgirls?
having worked in the international health insurance industry I can say that although your idea does have some faults (in terms of people moving abroad) it would be the best solution for the US Internally. 
You don't even have Shalrie.
So you don't agree with them, you just support them through your participation and dues, and promote them on the internet.  Got it.
DNA has been looking pretty [good] (http://i.imgur.com/DPJuDxL.png) to me lately. Recently got S-off and CM 10.1 is on the way. 
She doesnt respect you, dump her. You dont need to take taht shit. 
9,894,951 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,894,951 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around - 9,894,950 bottles of beer on the wall!
I have not been fortunate enough to be completely zit-less, but my complexion has definitely improved. :)  The only down-side is my boyfriend is apparently grossed out watching me slather on the coconut oil. His thought is "Oh, that makes her skin so much nicer...but oh, god, is that disgusting."   Naturally, knowing this, I purposefully do this in front of him. HA!
Should have been "are ya'll"  Cherry would fit in perfectly in the US South.
Republicans owned.
Its in your preorder email. Says your place number......
Check out www.whatKeyAmIIn.com, you might find it helpful. It will help you figure out what key you're in and then display a fretboard showing you which notes work in that key.
Old Montreal, lots of free activities !
There's a nice video of her taken from an elevator camera here:  http://beforeitsnews.com/strange/2013/02/outrageous-creepy-alert-lam-elisa-elisa-lam-2447466.html  It looks like she's under the influence of something.
What the actual fuck? 
Look I accepted your post true first time, but this copy pasta is getting tedious.
Youre wrong. Natalie took out Erik. If you want to stop arguing then stop immaturely demanding to get the last word
you mean, like the ragecomics with the Reddit alien on it?
I've lived here long enough to know that winter isn't over yet
I went into the PGA Superstore today to swing both the Anser and the G25.  I liked both of them, but came away preferring the G25 a tad more.  It was easier to work the ball (of course, who really knows with those monitors) and I didn't mind the longer shape of the head.  I am not well versed in launch angle, ball spin rate, or those numbers to compare with each other, but I think the G25 just may be the one.
/r/slothporn
Way to go Oakland.
I'm far past entry level. I'm looking for something more high end possibly. I have the strength and control for the higher ball strengths.
It's the porn capital of the world.
Okay, but you look nervous.  What's wrong?
Not edgy enough, man
I had an experience somewhat similar to this today. My boyfriend woke up for a quicky and got a little too rough. He ended up ripping my earring out. I bled all over our brand new white sheets, passed out, and then threw up when I woke. Worst experience of my life. 
Dwarf Fortress... I wouldn't say no one seems to have heard of it but people just seem intimidated by it.
[Here's where I found it.](http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/zzhzc/stoner_link/)
They are important in human existence. That's why we fight about them. And eventually, they get resolved, for the most part. I'm one of a growing number of pro-gay marriage Christians. Even the president of Focus on the Family has admitted that an overwhelming majority of young Christians in the United States will vote for gay marriage.  I guess what I'm saying is that our views on the theologically peripheral issues change over time, just like with everyone else.
Looks like these http://www.adidas.com/us/product/mens-training-power-perfect-20-shoes/EV210
Ha. You ready for a copout?  They are all AWESOME PEOPLE. But seriously, they are all awesome people.  Sorry.
i mean reposts are inevitable, millions of users have seen this before but there are still millions who havent.  So are reposts "wrong"? no, but ill admit it is annoying seeing this pic at the the top every couple of weeks
However you look at it, they are slaves to their own serotonin and dopamine receptors.
It seems like most of the [highly rated] comments are being pretty objective. As a 4chan user, I've several times came across these kind of pictures. And while I don't save them, I can understand that people have a fetish for these things and I cannot hate them for that. I'm happier knowing that they are fapping to these pics rather than committing the act for real.
Half a pterodactyl, keep searching, the other half is probably close by!
No.  You just don't wake up.
Literally worse than AIDS
No he just turned 22.
Its not for everyone.
I feel sketched out *driving* through that back route, I can't imagine walking it.
Yes. I would:  * Do a late contribution and put $5,500 of your $16,000 into a Vanguard Roth IRA for 2012 (you can do this up until tax day) * Also place a $5,500 2013 contribution in there.  You can always remove the money you've put into a Roth IRA and your earnings will grow interest free. It's an excellent idea for someone in your situation.
Pretty sure it's a nin root.
I had a question that went along the lines of; 'Do you have to be crazy to have a lot of cats, or do you get a lot of cats and become crazy?'.  Turns out, both.
Good luck! (:
Are you sure you listed all plugins? Animals shouldn’t despawn on server reboot unless you use MobLimiter or some other mob culling plugin. Could Essentials be configured to do this?
You forgot to metion the blinker fluid manifold.
Depending on what style you want, the Anjunadeep compilations are pretty damn good, my favourite being :01.
I do feel it's gotten out of hand myself too. The only issue is a person in my position is not seen as rational when I mention it because of the usual assumptions associated with having faith in god.  But I don't blame people. I really don't, because there are some horrible people out there. Unfortunately the loudest voice is heard and the ones speaking are crazy as hell. I'm glad to see so many open minded people replying to this comment haha. Cheers!
If you legitimately think Moreno is better than Jamaal Charles then you should quit watching football right now. Moreno puts up inferior numbers even with the benefit of having a top-3 offensive line and Peyton Manning to draw attention away from him.
Dark Souls is way harder for me. 
God damn it. This could have yielded so much jerky which would have kept for a very long time without needing to be frozen.
At first I was like 'meh' but then you said over 200 WOMEN AND CHILDREN? Then I was like OMG UGGH
Kda does not matter if you win bro ;p
We used to have 2 that would fight all time. Ah. the memories.
Tried it, not too disgusting. 50/100, would drink again to prove my manliness. Note: the one I tried had a different snake, not a cobra.  However, I refused to drink the mice wine/spirit one, too icky for me.  Semi-related: I received bottle of [this](http://i.imgur.com/gNwljJ0.jpg) shit as a gift. It's a 53% ABV sorghum spirit and it's terribad. I might review it here for the lolz. I almost sent samples of this to people as "mystery drams" but decided against it. It would have been hilarious!
Still can't belive i got it on 12'th pick with other dimir players passing it! x)
thanks for the recipe, your ramen looks deliciously spicy.
But the black has... *More* ;D
I personally think the new Admirals will be Vice Admirals we saw at the war and in other places (e.g. Strawberry, Momonga, etc). No way they are as strong as Akainu or Aokiji. 
THIS! SO MUCH!
(づ￣ ³￣)づ
I didn't find out about the mew glitch till about 2 months ago. So I didn't have that privilege. xP lol 
Then how would you know that you care about it?
Hehe thank you 8} You're too good to me!
PSA: the click is not risky.
Jerry Jones vs Subtlety.
Love your lips! What colour is that?
Looking at Brom's actions later, I doubt that was it. Brom was never a Dick when Eragon was concerned. He always wanted what was best for him.
One doesn't ever push a lawnmower without coercion
Sexy, Classy, Smoker.
Either way, do you want to tell a joke that people have heard before and will think is less funny on a technicality? It doesn't matter if it's technically original if it sounds derivative people will enjoy it less. Besides, 6 years is a long time to tell an okay joke anyway. 
I see what you did there.
Mine occurred about 11 years ago, my finger actually looks perfectly fine but every now and then it gets really stiff and I have a hard time bending it. It doesn't happen often enough for me to want to go to the doctor about though.
Not this.
Fuck this world.
no the serveer will not have j.s.r.s sound
Good God!  David Tennent with a cat.  This might just crash reddit.
You're so cool. 
i must have that!
To the Batcave!
To be fair, unemployment for engineers is like 1%. I personally think the smart thing to do would be to *discourage* people from being engineers so that they're would be higher wages for the engineers who are there already.
Oooh, is there a subreddit for that? lol
In 6 months you're squatting 325? May want to record yourself to check for depth unless you left something out... Not that it's impossible just unlikely.
Yeah, it seems like Gould had a bit of "DeNiro Syndrome" going on — he was kind of a clamshell.
The sculptor of the Lion of the Confederacy said it was totally original...   http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oakland_Cemetery_(Atlanta)  Sounds legit...
Sign me up!
Monsters in the basement
wow umm i don't have words lol
SO. Someone want to put all this Cap space and LTIR into english for us less-knowledgeable fans? What is LTIR.
Lol.  Wow, I guess.  If somebody mentions a study on here I guess you can dismiss it out of hand.  Why can you say indeed.
i did not know this.
So can a vacuum cleaner...
While the show hasn't been at its best this season, I hardly think they've hit rock bottom just yet. They can definitely do worse. And who knows, maybe they will. I'll be watching regardless though because I agree its still better than most shows. And hopefully it finds its footing again soon. 
If I expand my present mine (physically, I have no idea where to get lava) will I get more ore points?   Also, can you fix the ones that aren't spawning anything? I developed a few holes in the wall that used to spawn things and no longer do. I asked Jack about it and he killed the server on me.
actually it kind of is. a teacher was posting photos of an under aged student to /r/creepshots  do you know what jail bait is? it's not child porn. it's exactly what i showed you.  &gt;I'm not really sure what those articles have to do with anything actually.  then you're willfully ignorant.
I had a money clip once. It broke and I lost $100 and a gift card. A friend of mine bought one as well and his eventually broke. They were both different kinds. 
I was referencing an old SNL skit, and by "old," I mean it had Chris Farley in it.
Gay much
[this will unrussle your jimmies if you need it.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ygr5AHufBN4)
Wat?
I think it's fine.  In fact, just earlier this week I sent a small email to the grad coordinator at a school I applied to that just said, "Hello, I was wondering if I could get a status update on my graduate applicaton?  Regards."  They emailed me back quickly, and let me know decisions/offers would be going out at the end of this week.   When you email, just keep it simple and to the point.  9 times out of 10 they'll get back to you quickly, and they're not bothered by it, its their job.  I should note, I've already been accepted to a PhD program and their deadline was Feb 15th, the place I emailed for a status update had a deadline of Feb 1st.  So it was close to a month w/o any kind of response.  If you're in that kind of situation I say email away.
&gt; See, you lying little racist shithead.  Rage more, that's going to help your argument.  &gt; Your claim: "The crime rates among blacks in the US are [1] 7-8 times higher than that of whites." False.  [It's actually true.](http://www.examiner.com/article/federal-statistics-of-black-on-white-violence-with-links-and-mathematical-extrapolation-formulas)  **"Blacks are seven times more likely than people of other races to commit murder, and eight times more likely to commit robbery."**  &gt; The facts concern only homicide, not crime  Yeah, because homicide totally isn't a major crime or anything. By the way, my original link also compares robbery.  &gt; and in a range going 29 years, which you want to compare with the poverty rates of one year. Old data is not representative of today.  Except it also shows that the rate is 7 times higher in each individual year.   &gt; The facts also state that about equally as many blacks are the victims, as offenders.  That's because the main victims of black crime are blacks themselves. But blacks are way more likely to commit crime against whites than whites are against blacks.  &gt; The facts also state that Whites and Blacks are about equally as often victims or offenders. (All between 45% and 53%)  Now it's obvious that you lack even basic math skills and logic.  Blacks are 12.5% of the population, whites are the majority. So if the total share of all crime is about equal, then blacks are still way more LIKELY to be offenders.  Do you not understand what a rate is?  Hot damn you're failing miserably.  &gt; The facts: Victims and Offenders by Demographic Group, 1976-2005 Rate per 100,000 population "Blacks are disproportionately represented as both homicide victims and offenders. The victimization rates for blacks were 6 times high er than those for whites. The offending rates for blacks were more than 7 times higher the rates for whites."  Yes, thank you for validating my argument inadvertently due to your inability to properly interpret data.  You just failed so hard right now it's almost surreal. 
Yes,yes i do.
Unlike her kid.
Hid her mental illness, huh?  Are you supposed to tell your coworkers that you are worried about losing your edge.  Give me a break!
Every and all things Bon iver.
hello! i am still trying to figure out what name i want to use in bdsm context.. i started using Daddy's little prin-sith, but as i explore more kink, i find i like other things too. right now i'm trying out Lady Lolita. but i digress.  * When and how did you find out about your kink?  would have to be when i met my Daddy, around november of 2011. he introduced me to D/s and i haven't been the same since.  i didn't always know i was Dominant. i've always considered myself submissive (and i feel like that is what i am, first and foremost), but my most recent lover changed that for me. i am a very blunt, take charge kinda girl outside of the bedroom, and he's very service oriented. as a submissive, i felt i could introduce him to BDSM safely. and since i'm also a masochist, i have a pretty good idea of what i like, and i would just try things out on him. and this role has really grown on me.  * Did you have many issues coming to terms with your kink?  not really. i guess i always felt submissive (at least in the bedroom), but i just never explored it before. it's not that i didn't know i was kinky, and i think it sounds weird to say that BDSM completes me, but it's more like something that i guess i always knew i had, but didn't have the words to define or describe it before  * What kinks do you have?  Domination, bondage, cuffs, ball gags, face fucking, (trying to) deepthroat, spanking, bruises anywhere and everywhere, cross dressing, face sitting, crops, belts, nipple play, biting, hair pulling, collars, leashes, crawling, foot worship, pain, teasing, face slapping...  * Do you have a partner? If so, how long been kinky?  i have 3 partners that i play with, but only one that i Domme for. i've been with my sub around 7 months now, and we started exploring D/s probably 4-5 months ago  * What does female dominance mean to you?  to me, it's more of celebrating the feminine, the woman. celebrating and enjoying all the wonderful things that make me a woman  * What does dominance mean to you?  it's a responsibility i accept and take seriously. to truly dominate my sub, i make sure to be, not only an excellent example of a decent human being, but also a nurturing, honest, and loving Mistress.   * What does submission mean to you?  it's about giving yourself, every single part of you, up to be of use for another person. not just any other person, but someone who you trust to take care of your gift. it's about doing everything you are capable of doing to make this person's life easier/happier/less stressful  * What pleases you most about your sub?  oh, to choose one thing would be too difficult... i love the boy dearly. the way he rubs tiger balm on my bruises after a beating. the way he makes sure i'm fed, hydrated, satisfied, and warm. the way he holds my hair back when i'm throwing up from drinking too much. the way he drives me everywhere, no complaints. he takes exceptionally good care of me, and i haven't even gotten into how much i enjoy having sex with him.. he is such a loyal and devoted pet. idk if i can say anything else to show that.  * What does your domme do that drives you wild?  my Doms are male... and i could go on about the things they do that drive me wild, but that doesn't really belong here (:
Do mods always have to say please upvote for visibility, I get no karma from self posts? Most annoying shit ever.
Had that shit for at least 8 years at this point. Indents and bumps on my back and chest from scarring woo. 
size of shield only affects speed when blocking. at no other point does it affect movement speed elsewhere that i'm aware.
But you have consented, by nature of your residence.  Again, I ask: is there anything that you think it is reasonable to be taxed for?
Thanks mate. The G. label indicates RCS thrusters for manoeuvring. There are six arrange around the ship. Two forward on either side of the nose, one on port and starboard and two on aft, above and below. The aft RCS won't vector but the other 4 arrays vector up and down. Similar to how they behave in the carrier shown in the production images for Starcitizen.
Great success!
It's just comment karma
It kind of reminds me of Stone Mountain in Georgia.  Its just that it has a lion and not a bunch of slave owners on horseback. 
Bbbbut...why?
I am a lawyer, legally speaking it doesn't really violate any statutes that I can think of. Moreover I wouldn't be involved in disseminating the content, merely renting the offices by the hour.  it won't be an issue.  I think that for all those reasons, I might try it.  Just have to find the financial sweet spot. 
Ah, yes. The Candiru.
I'm never going to get tired of these.
hahahah that was amazing
Mirror: http://justice-blog.com/Htbbc/car-revenge-for-the-win    (This mirror is provided automatically because youtube regularly removes videos against their terms of service).
As a female, I don't get it. Can someone please explain why this is so appealing?
Except the atom.smasher.org/highway link at the bottom of the image. It's no photoshop so much as an image generator. Still fake.
Is that a correspondent from NPR talking?   I'm thinking of the guy from Radiolab.  **EDIT**: Jad Abumrad. Is that you!?!?
Who said anything about driving? 
And i would not disagree but i would rather spend time around every other culture
Sub layer?
well... Then PERHAPS you are not wearing it in the traditional manner. I'd be happy to check!!!
I'm liking Adrenaline Mob so far!
It's sort of true, though. There's a transfer from electrons when clouds rub against one another and the discharge of electrons creates lightning which creates thunder.
can you post a link to a 25$ cased raspberry-pi.  All I can find is between 48$ and 59$, or kits with accessories over 79$
Patient has a healthy cocaine habit.
Relevant username, ForcedToJoin?
That's odd. [](/twiponder)  Do you have the exact error message?   I'm tempted to think that, since it's blocked, you might not have administrator rights there, but I can't really say much without knowing more. Hell, post it as its own thread in /r/betterponymotes since I'm probably not the best person to ask, really.
He just won him self another fan with that song
And baby you've got a stew.
OMG Mark Cuban!
[](/dashiewhat)What do you mean? You can set steam to offline mode if you want.
ISU!
Its true. Some of these women are stone cold foxes.
He also lost a 1v1 when he had bought and Akali hadn't when they were both 6 :/
So that one guy got no karma for that hilarious Scooby Doo story/joke he posted? 
I know someone who had over 30.  He mined ice.  A LOT OF ICE.
Birdemic, oh my god.
Must I be obliged to bring up the Tebow-to-Jets trade?
Sorry to break it to you but that jersey is fake. Hope you didn't pay too much for it.
From the comments in that site, looks like it's the prelude to a porno shoot...so yeeeah.
Got drunk and vomited all over the bathroom. Their dad had to clean it up cause I was too hungover to move. I'm the worst.
Any thoughts on Full Tilt Poker, Howard Lederer et al, etc? 
Did you ask Brad Dourif to do the Chucky voice?  If not...shame on you.
Same. I don't get the crazy messages, just the crazies. It's like "no wonder why you're still fucking single!" Just goes back to the old adage, "if it sounds too good to be true, it is."
My way by limp bizkit( I'm not saying its a good song or they are a good band) will always be the song I most associate with wrestlemania and wrestling in general. Was it the 2000 wrestlemania theme or used in some capacity in 2000? 
Upstate NY'er here...  You can easily spot the Jersey tourists without looking at license plates when 2 teenage girls get out and take pictures of each other pumping gas.
Am I the only one around here who thinks that excuses need to stop for dogs that do this shit?  Stop the victim blaming.  How did he "taunt" the dog? That has become a VERY broad definition these days! 
Good, except the top chests will not open if you put this in a 5x5x4 space surrounded by stone, and the floor needs an additional support for the water.
Im not saying myself.  I grew up in a different generation.  But today the 20s and under are already posting every shit they take and every vomit they make on the internet, along w/ every meal and every video of ever odd thing they do.  Do you really think the generation after them will care about privacy?  Do you think they'll care about privacy when the option is - all the information mankind has every possessed and is currently creating as accessible as a personal memory, or pretend 'privacy' which wont actually be private b/c we are already using every bit of communication information to monitor everyone as of today.  I mean people with out this will be as primitive by comparison as insects are to humans.  No, transparency is the future and combined knowledge will make us something completely different then is even conceivable today.  You know, assuming this tech works and doesnt kill people after 5 years of use, or drive them insane.  And dont even get me started on the AI factor, when some of our new AI come online, you'll be able to link with them too.  Imagine 'feeling' the city you live in b/c its monitored and managed by an AI you can link into.  You wont need traffic reports, you'll be able to feel the traffic.  And honestly you wont need to drive, b/c you'll be able to lift yourself up and move yourself around using any of the various tools of the city, much like you lift and move your arm...  Our idea of consciousness will be forever altered and far less individualized.  Which, in my opinion is a bit of an illusion anyways.
I have some dryness under my eyes (no matter WHAT I do), so it's still appearing a little cake-like.  I'm not giving up on it yet, though.
Makes me wonder what the dare would have been. 
[Jean-Michel Basquiat](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jean-Michel_Basquiat)
My dad says he made nearly 100 bucks in a night doing this
great work. amazing presentation.
Hey, at least you'll have one next year. My cakeday is on Feb 29. I have to wait 4 years between mine...
So how did he get his information?
Yeah the pops seem to be a good thing
yeah but March is worse...it's women's history month
Hmmm let's try to put this in perspective for you....BLACK WIDOWS ARE DEADLY! I wouldn't pardon one if it were in my living space with or without the loss of a beloved family because they are dangerous. The same principle goes for lions in places where are a problem and yes even estranged cats and dogs hence why our house are sealed shut.  People generally don't like to have things around that can potentially hurt them no matter how beneficial the creature is....that's why it's called survival of the fittest.
I dont think that first paragraph is fair because that is how it was presented from the get go. 
When we are done eating, drinking etc. and the evening is really over (except for perhaps a long drive home when she can sleep, and I have to drive) she likes to linger over coffee or another drink. Drives me nuts.
My best friend sent this same picture to me from work one night. I died laughing!! 
every once and a while I'll get an itch and want to play that game again. I wish I could find it on GOG.
[Ahem](http://i.imgur.com/nxhUIfJ.jpg)
Yup. That's why most LSD in the world comes from only a few places, supplemented by the occasional grad student making it on the side. It's not an easy synthesis like say Meth is. 
[*le sign face*](/derpysign)
Samuel Johnson's two long poems *London* and *The Vanity of Human Wishes*.   They're both incredible, though I'm not even drawn to that type of metre. They were also among Samuel Beckett's favourites by the way.
Make a post here and one in CC asking if they'd prefer it Friday night, Saturday or Sunday. 
I'm still not certain where you are seeing them change a position.  In the case of the Jesuits, it was the Jesuits that changed, not the Pope.  And of course a Pope is fallible, just not when speaking on matters of faith and morals.  
Pink guns can be bought in large calibers as well. Nothing wrong with a girl trying to accessorize with a gun. 
That's how I feel about The Walking Dead.
I completely disagree. O'Reilly has shown he can be successful in the NHL already as a centre. Hes 22 years old and has a ton of upside. 
Yep be sure to shun those who share this again.  This should be your one and only chance to see this, ever. It's not amusing at all to see it a second time.
It looks like gravity still works. 
Tell that to the CBC..
We should all have that kind of compassion. Just like, stop being assholes to each other 
You just invented the greatest way to fuck up murder investigations ever. Just write "4chan /b/" on the victim.
I would talk to the mechanic who originally quoted you and see if they would be interested in buying your car. *Sometimes* mechanics are interested, OR they would know someone who would be. My husband owns an auto repair shop and he's bought a few cars from customers from time to time. 
I've done it at MSG before, but not for stubhub and the rangers  I'm assuming stubhub emails you the tickets? if so that should be all you need
http://i.imgur.com/dqPZxc9.gif
Doesnt it also cost like 8 times as much?
All political correctness means is that we we shouldn't saunter around assuming that all black men are criminals, and that we should avoid using inflammatory terms. Using phrasing like "There are black people then there are... (you know the rest)" which you did not but is often seen in this sort of thread is something political correctness opposes, not open discourse using appropriate language. Political correctness does not disallow the statement of statistics.   From the Proper Use segment of the referenced Uniform Crime Report: Data users should not rank locales because there are many factors that cause the nature and type of crime to vary from place to place. UCR statistics include only jurisdictional population figures along with reported crime, clearance, or arrest data. Rankings ignore the uniqueness of each locale. Some factors that are known to affect the volume and type of crime occurring from place to place are:  • Population density and degree of urbanization.   • Variations in composition of the population, particularly youth concentration.   • Stability of the population with respect to residents’ mobility, commuting patterns, and transient factors.   • Economic conditions, including median income, poverty level, and job availability.   •Modes of transportation and highway systems.   • Cultural factors and educational, recreational, and religious characteristics.   • Family conditions with respect to divorce and family cohesiveness.   • Climate.   • Effective strength of law enforcement agencies.   • Administrative and investigative emphases on law enforcement.   • Policies of other components of the criminal justice system (i.e., prosecutorial, judicial,  correctional, and probational).   • Citizens’ attitudes toward crime.   • Crime reporting practices of the citizenry.  Really, think about, for a moment, the nature of race relations in the USA, and tell me if none of those factors to at least some extent invalidated the 'clear as day' notion that your linked article suggests. Statistics are only ever as useful as the context in which they're fielded. 
Awesome news for cap-strapped teams. 
what?
"mom, why did dad leave? Ill tell you when your 18". Now I'm 26 still waiting to find out the details.
That is true, I could never get good pull. I just tried it because I had 10 people in my garage and no bong.
I am significantly more classy.
Most employers are looking to cut cost, so they really won't drug test anyone who's seems sober and functioning.  
Definitely impressive. Not to mention I still own an iPhone 4S, so I can only imagine how much better the pictures are on the iPhone 5.
I think you nailed it here.
Actually I think you make a great point here, but I don't think you are willing to admit it on the evolutionary side.  It's all hypothesizing with no actual evidence.  We can both bend the evidence to suit our interpretations... that doesn't prove either or invalidate the other.  Basically, comes down to personal preference.  This has been fun.  With you luck friend.
Africa is on the far right. The rest is Spain / Gibraltar.
Boom!
That's the right attitude, unfortunately.  I don't really know what it's like at other schools, but I think you will need to be self reliant no matter where you go.  Make sure you keep visiting places like this, SDN, other students, 3rd party review sources, etc etc.  Don't just immediately buy into whatever the school tells you is important.  I complain about this school a lot, but in the end I got what I needed and I have some degree of confidence I will do well.  I'm not sure I could have honestly asked for much more than that.
...and then there is the Dvorak keyboard, which made masturbation more painful by putting all the important typing keys in the center of the keyboard.   I can still feel my hands cramping up, just thinking about it.  QWERTY Motherfucker!
And boom goes the dynamite
thats a tight lookin bum.
The Brakes tip is interesting. However, the Smoking and the Insurance tip are completely ridiculous.  If you smoke in a non-smoking car, you could be liable.  I'm a non-smoker, and i *know* when a car has been smoked in, "industrial deodorizer" or not, and I won't drive in it.  Telling people to ignore the No Smoking sticker?  That really is a douche-move.  As for insurance, if you already have insurance, it *never* makes sense to buy rental insurance.  Just like it *never* makes sense to throw a $10 bill on the ground every day.  I personally have totalled a rental car and walked away (waived the renter's insurance; guy rear-ended me while i was stopped; drove it back to dealership; never had an issue.)  3+ years and you make these errors?  No comment.
http://soundcloud.com/sheolmusic/new-neurofunk-shit/s-9L2Ke  First neurofunk track. What can I improve?
[I beg to differ](http://i.imgur.com/MjofNKZ.png)
and campaigning, no less.  i guess ryan thinks obama wants to get a jump on that 2016 race as well.
some Volvo's have them in the trunk, some Chrysler's have them behind the left fender in front of the tire. check your owners manual for your vehicles battery location. 
Not true. Contracts made by minors are generally voidable, but that doesn't mean they need the approval of a guardian to sign up for a social network -- or that guardians are responsible for the contract.  Also, like most websites, Instagram doesn't allow anyone under 13 to join (which makes those kids into criminals if they try, of course).
As a homer who roots for all Indiana teams.. I now will get to watch Big 10, ACC, and Big East tourneys every year with vested interest. This just magnified my already engorged cbn erection.
I'm of the firm belief that the best way to find love is to abandon the "search" for it. I'm not saying be apathetic or expect companionship with no effort, but once you transition from a mindset of need fulfilling (I NEED to be in a relationship because ____) to wanting a relationship (I am content with me and I don't need anything other than myself for happiness. I want to enter into this relationship) then it seems like love always follows. I've observed this in my own life (spent 3 years desperately searching without dating a soul. Had a major reality check and reevaluated my wants and needs. Found my SO of 3 years within the next 4 months) and the lives of my friends as well.   As for specifics to your query, generic xSTJ warning applies.  In seriousness, I guess I'll just describe my most valued facet of my relationship (M [Ne] INFP and F [Fe] INFJ) I feel listened to and understood. Like really listened to. Usually when I talk to someone I sense their disinterest and fade my thoughts into dejected silence. Even among friends who do care what I have to say I perceive a difference. My INTP friend is wonderful to discuss any academic topic with but horrible for sharing feelings with. My INTJ friend always *thinks* he understands me but I sense some disconnect that becomes clear when he attempts to regurgitate my feelings back through metaphor, similar experience, etc. The gist is there, but its not completely me. My ENFP friend *feels* he understands me, but he thinks we are identical and so I feel 95% understood by him, but not wholly. With my INFJ Gf I felt what it feels like to be understood so much so that it brought me to tears. She *gets* me like no one else I've ever met (save two other INFJs :p)   For me, feeling understood beyond the feeling detached logic level is very important.
People used to defend (to their deaths) that seatbelts were not necessary. Then it became a law. Now everyone knows seatbelts are better than no seatbelts.  Laws can teach behavior, good and bad.
Well, there's a fine line between normal and creepy, and you have to admit -- in her shoes, that was very creepy.  You were better off going with something a little more subtle like: Would you like to go to dinner sometime?  That would have been more acceptable and wouldn't have caused  both of you such grief. Shit happens though - it's funny. You have to laugh at yourself sometimes, but yes, do take a more calculated approach next time :)
A stealth bomb? Oh no! Xp
Huh?
You are a very handsome man!
We try not to sexualize her
I always loved this old lady crab apple tree Ramone.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RgzZJBO7wsA
Soccer &gt;I played in High School and I was an enforcer.  Nope. No such thing exists in soccer. This isn't boxing on ice or, how you call it overseas, "hockey".
mmm I wouldn't make you wait ;)
Attempting to "stop those stoners from smoking" will always fall short.
It's one huge issue:  The Colorado Constitution's Section 2 title 13 reads:   Right to Bear Arms - The right of no person to keep and bear arms in defense of his home, person and property, or in aid of the civil power when thereto legally summoned, shall be called in question; but nothing herein contained shall be construed to justify the practice of carrying concealed weapons.  These d-bag's took an oath to uphold that constitution and they're trampling all over it..  /edit: speeeling..
check out the end. i dont know whats more pathetic, brian or siri. didnt joe give him a new galaxy s3 with google now? 
He... he looks like a Klingon... Sort of...
I couldn't read this article after Curry's moves were described as "flippy and spinny". The author is in serious need of a larger vocabulary.
There's an entire genre of porn that disagrees with you.
omg adorable. TAKE FRECKLES AND LIVE IN FRECKLY DOG HEAVEN. so much karma too. you will be able to swim in it like scrooge mcduck!
You deserve to feel good about yourself bud! Good on you.
Its 26-32 for everything else. 
haa I am safe !! i wake up at 4
I don't really know. I put in my debit information, it took me to a page that showed me all the info I needed. I told my boyfriend this was super cool, and he should check his score, put in my debit info again, and he was taken to a different page than me. Turns out, I was taken to the premium page or w/e. I had to stop the payment with my bank. They fought it and I got my money back. This was after about 3 hours on the phone with the people who work for them.
If I have a job based on typing speed and accuracy, I don't say 'I'm looking for someone that can type 100wpm...but if you happen to be missing 2 fingers then 70wpm is okay'
Same.  If Calgary makes the playoffs, they're just a first-round stepping stone for whoever they end up playing.  Far better to tank and build a team that can actually achieve something in the post season.
It is all based on opinion. A lot of people value them the same as shinys, but I don't consider them worth anything. 
I'm always really wary about those swirled powders - it feels like all of the colors will be washing out each other and I prefer uniform applications.
Thanks for the reply!  I've seen quite a bit about the running, so I'm definitely going to make something for propping up pieces and catching drips. I've mostly seen people using individual trays instead of just covering the shelf with a slab. I wonder about the pros/cons of the two methods?
If only I were 13 again
Went morally bankrupts yeeeeeaarrs ago.
A new set of bosses.
Nice. I'm curious about the stand you have for them though. It looks like it would go with my Mixamp and A40 wonderfully.
His offensive game is a far cry from what it used to be.   I would rather not bring him in, especially with more time left on his deal
Some Nuke those fuckers. 
I don't know how you feel about  chiropractors but between the webster technique (took us 3 visits) and some moves from spinningbabies my little one flipped around 37-38 weeks. She is my first and I wanted to avoid a c section at all costs! Good luck momma!
Troof!
My newborn daughter. 
Seriously get it together, homo gigantis. Just because you live in a magical kingdom does *not* mean you can piss all over common rhyming schemes!
9,894,950 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,894,950 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around - 9,894,949 bottles of beer on the wall!
I thought i read 1:1 weapon swaps? when i tried it didnt accept it  " Hello! I am a scrapbanking bot! I buy 2 craftable weps at a scrap each, and sell 2 weps for a scrap. Type "backpack" in this chat to buy weps, and trade me to sell!"  its viceversa
&gt;That means users could choose: &gt; - The LTS release - The rolling release updated daily or as frequently as desired - The rolling release updated at least monthly  Stable, unstable and testing you say ?
I don't *think* so... but I could be wrong. I'm not deeply knowledgeable about the backstory. 
That is correct, I'm going to have to make these harder.  That took all of 8 minutes, nicely done.
The first step was "Take color photo". Didn't say anything about taking it from the Internet.  To be honest, my first reaction when I saw the photo was that it looked like a recent photo that had been greyscaled.
In the tests, Jim clearly and obviously increased his rate of fire as the magazines got smaller, which is how he managed to achieve faster times with more magazines. I think Christy's was a more accurate demonstration of firing as fast as you can accurately regardless of the size of the magazines.  Also, it is obvious that they were counting their shots as every reload happened with the last round in the chamber. In a self defense situation, you may not have the presence of mind to count rounds thus adding an extra step to the reload (racking the slide or pushing the slide release) and adding a little more time.  Just to be clear, I am not critiquing the overall message of the demonstration, just the method used to perform it.
What kind of answers were you expecting for this question? 
Why didn't they missile the fuck out of the SAM site?
Some people subconsciously believe that a high karma score means they are intelligent and/or popular. 
Weird, Flickr is telling me that the photo was taken in Lake Louise haha. Silly mobile versions
"but don he was raised in BC"   WHA? NAH! CANADA IS ONLY ONTARIO, MANITOBA, ALBERTA N SASKATCHEWAN! THUMBS UP! 
rly ? haha i thought about discrimination. Cool ill not do it again )) thx 4 info mate
I love people like you! Keep on keepin' on!
Funny enough I don't see the new hero Ghost in there. Given that this pack comes with the M4X and AK470 guns, you'd think the most recent hero would show as well.
Because he is a decent person. I doubt he would leave somebody that he deeply cared for to die in a terrible way.
Resident Evil 4. "Detrás de ti, imbécil!" ("Behind you, idiot!") ...probably not the most brilliant enemies ever but hey.
You'll have a great time! I go to a ton of games every year, or at least try to. Its always free calendar day that week too!
LOLOLS DUDE UR SO FUCKIN GHEY!!!¡¡!
"Robot Revolt" disaster unlocked!
FUCK YEAH
Agreed, just because there is some sort of religious connection doesn't mean its an issue. However this is up to the administration doing their job to vent groups before hand. Frankly, I tend not to trust mine in such issues.
That those little balls in tapioca pudding were fish eggs (thanks, grandma)
DAE PLAY THIS GEM HUEHUEHUEHUEHUE. DAES NARHWAL BACON AT MIDNIGHT!?
Is the dice important?
Yeah, there's a serious problem there when clean air becomes even rarer than honest reporting.
Ah, the good old soccer mom reach.
Get 500 bucks, take a bus to semi-tourist town in Mexico, find job washing dishes or something. It really is as easy as that. Then if you can't find a job, just make some food and sell it on the beach.  Source: My past 6 months. Mexico is fucking awesome.
I was dared to poop into a girl's butt-hole. And then she had to poop it back... into my butthole. And then we'll just keep doing it back and forth. With the same poop. Forever.  )) &lt;&gt; ((
Did you pay up? Also, is your friend now a stripper? Anyone who works that hard for a dollar...
You would have loved where my tongue went next ;-)
Or go to /b/ for the full experience.
Good upvote, have an upvote.
I run a Tron/Chris/Felicia team for fun. Neither are great assists for Tron (is that a surprise?).  I think the typical "derp Doom" excuse works, as would Strange. Sentinel is easily one of Tron's bestest assists. I used to run Storm with Tron and it's actually not too awful if you can get timings correct.
disgonbgud.gif
I would be almost unrecognizable without my beard...hmmm....
When she said I gave her chlamydia. I was a virgin when she said that. So I said, "move along, ho"
TIL. I love fun little facts. I wonder what these guys taste like. 
Except the excuse about studios being in the Bay area. If it's too expensive to live there, put your studio elsewhere. Tehre are plenty of cheaper cities which would welcome new businesses, there is no reason they all need to be in SF. 
I feel as if the word is rapist. 
Is that a cigarette in her left hand or a left handed cigarette?
Thank you for submitting.  Unfortunately your submission has been removed because there is a discrepancy between the resolution stated in the title and at the source. Please resubmit this with the proper resolution, which is **2513x1413**.  For information regarding this and similar issues please see the FAQs on the sidebar.  Thank you!
or you could store the banlist on your own computer, and when playing from another computer you put everything on a flash drive.
And yet so far there's been elections every 4 years, interrupted solely by a Civil War long ago. Liberals *have* lost, you know. They didn't feel the need to seize power then either.
How can you post something this cool and not list the hardware for us to reminisce about? Makes me want to go dig parts out of the basement.
I'm aware of that which is why i mentioned it. I've only been drinking 1-2 cups a week, but even that is more than i probably should be.
I was using my Metropolitan when I was asked, so I didn't want to give it up. But no, that's not true, I would lend the Metro and the Safari.
That's classy.
Yeah I was surprised you considered it typical. I didn't think the book of order included it. Might be a regional thing.  Your way (infant baptism then confirmation) makes more sense to me though.
I made an 11 inch bong that looked like a tree with a stand built on to it that was supposed to look like grass. But I guess what I'm saying is yes it works pretty well just make sure to make the opening big enough so when you put it in the kiln it shrinks to the right size and make sure to clean it really well before you use it so you don't get any nasty dust.
comment of the year
The position of the church isn't that we should do something because the bible says so. You should live a certain way to achieve happiness. It is to give life a direction and to give hope. It is the idea that the human spirit is something that has substance. That is not just something that exists as as a temporal chemical state.  If you are a hardcore atheist/nihilist why don't you kill yourself? Explore your consciousness. What reason is there to live. Every experience is just passing by and it is all going to end. I am for the greatest part an atheist but i refuse to believe that we as a species have arrived at the end of knowledge. 
They could have done that...better. 
i used to have this, it was in one of those kind of game packs with multiple games in it
I saw the same thing.. PP.. I kept looking for a G but couldn't see or find it. Oh well The Truth could use a logo I guess.
Maybe they didn't like the "mother" aspect of your awesome response... And cat like reflexes... But yeah hardly a thank you?... motherfuckers
This is a Windforce x2 Gigabyte 670, with an i5-3570k. It got 2,714 on the Fur Mark 1-min benchmark. 
Damn, I feel like an idiot, I was wondering why the screen wasn't shaking and gun noises were going off. Video games really have a way of bending the reality of things. &gt;.&gt;
wow you look delicious!!!:P
Lets just say he wasn't that well off and in middle school you'll do whatever for laughs.  Throw in a couple dollars and its completed
Its not that they don't WANT to drive it...a bit more mileage significantly drops resale value on these...sure they have a ton of money but wealthy people are still very conservative with their money (not to generalize of course).
It was a 20 year study that focused on psychological and physical well-being of a mixed-race area.  The patients weren't aware of it the lack of community because they weren't discussing their participation with others (probably).  Also, we typically don't tell the patients exactly what we're looking for in order to keep them from being biased.  (Of course, we get consent forms and tell them it's a study about heart attacks and such though). Over the 20+ years, they filled out questionnaires and had physicals.  The research showed a very high correlation between loneliness, depression and anger and heart attacks.  Loneliness was even more correlated than anger.
thats the one, the pictures look wors than it is but with more than about 5 people it gets bad
Its still modifying genetics, so I wanted an explanation or clarification for what language was in the bill, I wasn't arguing any points.
woo?
I knew that something like Django Western Taco would be mentioned.  Every time someone asks where to eat, the easy responses here are Northside, or in OTR on Vine, but frankly a $10 hotdog at the Senate isn't cheap! And I know this will get downvoted due to the "Downvote If it's not OTR or Northside Conspiracy" but here goes.  You want cheap?  Here's a list of inexpensive, but not "hip" restaurants, that are local to Cincy.  * Camp Washington Chili - From out of town? Give it a shot, it's a great place, and inexpensive. * Skyline/Goldstar - Both can be Cincinnati flavors, and both are not expensive. * White Castle - Cheap...and a chain, but cheap * Anchor Grille Covington * Dixie Chili - Newport  * Eastside Chili - Out by Amelia * Empress Chili - Westwood/Cheviot  (You get the idea about Chili places, but which one is best is another thread. I'd hit Camp Washington for it's uniqueness)  Some other places that don't have the "buzz", but are inexpensive with tasty food.  * Main Street Cafe - Newtown * Zip's - Hyde Park * Arthur's - Hyde Park * Quatman Cafe - Norwood (Great food AND cheap! I love to go there for lunch.) * (For expensive try Terry's Turf Club near Lunken Airport, it's great, but not cheap)  You wanted cheap, that's cheap, not necessarily the hipest, nor trendiest. But they won't break the bank, and they all have good food.
That's a roger! Give 'em hell! Over.
But the good thing is that you can post things on the free karma subreddit, only for upvotes, for four years :D
Had to watch it on Internet Explorer because Firefox wouldn't let me watch it. I'm not sure if I should have listened to Firefox or not.
In middle school, when I found out how cells and the human body works.
Not with that attitude, it can't.
Maybe, though I'm sure if it was an issue they thought if this.
Given how many chickens there are in the world...that's a lot of hencocks.
&gt;they are looking for comments on the new system to make it more user friendly.  The best way would be to get rid of it. I'd like to ask them what the HELL was wrong with the way it was?!
They're too busy getting their asses kicked to have any fun.
I didn't think that was a real sub. I'm sorely disappointed.
This is a pretty interesting question. One can say that not all muslims are exactly the same in the way that not all Jews or christians are the same. Some christians think evolution is a lie from the devil while others acknowledge the scientific truth of it. I think it's important to acknowledge that not all muslims around the world have exactly the same thoughts about evolution.   I think overall, a statement could be made saying that globally religion often gets in the way of scientific advancement. There are many examples of this throughout history. The second general statement that can be made is the god-of-the-gaps argument.   It would be interesting to see what /r/philosophyofscience had to say about this.
they can, the prefix for it is patriot
You've gotten a lot of good advice in this thread, not sure if I can add too it.  But I only spend a handful of my first 40 or so points on dps/utility - keeping in mind not to spend them in a way to take longer to get to HP nodes (or at least no more than 1 point or so out of the way).  Then I plan out my HP nodes that I'll want at a 'finished' build, around 80-85 points.  Then I head straight for those, taking the most efficient way I can and grabbing the gravy resist nodes along the way.  Once those HP nodes are complete, likely around 65+points in, then you can branch off and grab a few more of the dps/utility points or continue to head to more HP nodes.  Don't be afraid to grab a point knowing that you'll respec out of it.  You get plenty while leveling and it's not hard to get orbs of regret here and there either.  IMO, a good plan is to be prepared to respec out of 15 points to clean up your tree later.  In the end, you'll get more than enough dps from your gear and gems making those points spent on your tree not worth very much.  Good luck.
&gt; microorganisms in your gut &gt; more than the number of cells in your entire body.  Huh? Isn't your gut in your body? Or are these microorganisms somehow lacking any of their own cells?
Whoa, I heard legends about what you did. They still tell them around the campfire.
I'm an atheist, but I'd believe if I had some proof, or at least if religions made sense. Hinduism preaches being vegetarian, but meat has vitamins and proteins crucial for life. If God didn't want us to eat meat, then why would he make us dependent upon it? Buddhism ask you to let go of desire, I can't let go of wanting to cuddle with cute wittle puppies and food. :P  I also don't like that certain religions discriminate against homosexuals and other religions. Since these are the reasons why I'm atheist, I never act cocky around religious people or discriminate against them. I sometimes admire people who are religious, kind hearted, devoted but refrain from judging others. Atheists who make fun of religious people are just typical people who like to think they're better than others (i.e. white supremacists, nazis, Regina George, etc)
This is correct. I always book a compact and ask what the upgrade is. To date it has always been only $2-3 more but usually $10 less than renting the actual mid size. Solid advice.
Second one was nice.
No one is arguing that it shouldn't be taken seriously. But you shouldn't disregard the opinion that it may also be fake as 'idiotic' because that too is a very real possibility.
Fuck not this horse shit again. 
That is in fact a popular activity on nearby arches outside the park.  I saw a guy in a Batman costume do it once.
Pinot Grigio and S. Blanc are only paired with veggies? There has to be room for more
You seem to assume that removing and reworking certain mechanics automatically dumbs the game down and makes it casual and not serious.
Don't be. There's plenty of outfits (TAW, IR, CDL) that are already working towards coordination, we welcome like-minded people. If we can actually coordinate our numbers, the other factions are screwed. 
Probably not considering they are probably kings and kings can't be vassalized. If they are still duchies then it would be like trying to vassalize any other duchy I would imagine.
It was also a sign for peace until the Nazi's came along.
He is a Butthole Scientist, so I feel like I can trust what he says here.
Well I'm glad to have aided you in making other people feel bad. It's obviously what people on this sub like to do, judging by your upvotes.
The Nazi's viewed razors as barbaric (see pg. 234 of Mein Kampf),therefore all prisoners in concentration camps (as well as soldiers in the Wehrmacht) were given Nair to use, however because of it's wider availability people in concentration camps  were often exclusively given Nair for Women  , resulting in an outcry from observers 
He only wrote that one, the boys over at creaturebox.com did the art.
For guys and orgasm is usually mandatory but you are lucky as it is easier to achieve than female orgasms.  For the body language I would prefer either very submissive or overly aggressive like she really is thirsty for my cock. One of the polar opposites.  For the visuals I like it when they are looking at me but I can leave it but try to make sounds that are slurpy or 'vacuumy'.  A BJ is foreplay... or a finisher. Well but that is just my personal preference.
what do you do for work?
Do I live there? no. Colorado. 
If you have access to a gym make sure you do deadlifts on a regular basis. This helps strengthen the muscles in your lower back/lumbar region, preventing injury and degeneration. Especially important for men, as it gets harder to build muscle as you get older.  If you've ever had any back problems, building up these muscles will also help prevent previous injuries from becoming a chronic issue as you age.  In a dark setting (like a poorly lit stairwell) dip your head a bit and put your hand above your forehead, with the palm facing forward. We have a stairwell in the house I grew up in that once I got tall enough I started hitting my head on, and I'm by no means very tall in this subreddit. I got into the habit of running my hand along the ceiling in that stairwell as it curves down to meet the ceiling of the lower level so I knew when to duck.  Always pick to fight the horse-sized duck.  Elevate your computer monitors by stacking books under them. If you use a laptop consider getting a bluetooth keyboard to use with it so that your hands can be used at a comfortable height while the laptop itself sits higher. What you want to avoid is looking slightly downward at a screen all the time, as this will exacerbate stress in the shoulders and neck.
reminiscent of the "ringworm affair" in which dark skinned and light skinned Israeli children were separated and the dark skinned ones given powerful x-rays "for ringworm"...http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ringworm_affair
I don't know, I kinda like the idea of celebrating non-federal holidays as if they were Halloween. Next up: April Ghouls Day.
Again? How about you stop losing me and try finding me instead (See how smooth that was) ;). But seriously, what's that supposed to mean? Edit; Plus I meant it in more of a retorical way ;P
if you give me some better insults, I promise to use them.
Cool, thanks for answering
xD
the whole album is on the youtube channel this was posted from 
No. The smart ones among you aren't Christians any more.  And no. [You're responsible, and I'm not letting you off](http://www.atheistrev.com/2012/04/responsibility-of-religious-moderates.html). The fact that you're a victim of that evil shit too does not exculpate you. There's enough Internet all around you that there's no reason for you not to get a clue, and to keep believing that stupid bullshit your parents were too ignorant to reject.  It's not a few bad apples who spoil the bunch, you ignoramus. Most of those problems I've mentioned require majorities in the electorate. Majorities you contribute to. We can have a truce when you stop believing in fairy tales based on human sacrifice.
As that would be a wonderful ideal, i think it might be a little too late since public perception has pretty much gotten it into their heads that the republican party IS this stodgy, whiny, scared old men (and a handful of women) that just don't like "them darkies/fags/foreigners/pagans/etc."   I would love to see them go back to their roots too... But i'm a little leery that unless a new party was formed for the exact purpose of doing that, the republican party itself is doomed to be viewed as the nasty and closed-minded thing it's become.   Maybe we should clone the founding fathers? I'm sure they'd be more than willing to bitch-slap some of those neo-con thugs a couple times for perverting a once great political party/ideal.
Melbourne, Oz anyone?
You are my new favorite poster.  + subscribe: fanclub
Good thing my dad is a lawyer!
Start from the first season. Yes, it's a long watch. But you will thank yourself later. It's more rewarding having seen all the classic episodes.
Why didn't I think of this!!!???
Great quote to live by
You know me, I don't relax.
I would like to point out that I have had a much better time dealing with those questions when I talk about the ideas them self rather than trying to argue a stance.  A real debate that encompasses large topics like religion is hard to do.  Prolific writers like Irish_Whiskey make some very salient points, but I don't have time to dive into all of them.  I think that this causes people to think I am close minded because I don't argue and counter argue ever detail.  To add to your 2) point, I dislike how offering an alternate conclusion is somehow treated as trumping my conclusion for no other reason than it creates doubt.  Understanding doubt is key, but doubt is not disproof.
Is he also literally Hitler? /sarcasm
-------------
Haha! That's great. :D Glad I could help!  I'm working on a new one. Saturday is grocery day. Eck. :P
I tried my best to mix it up, asking trivia questions and looking for a way to randomly select name -- the last half dozen or so prizes were given away via just random name selection from the user list =P  It definitely wasn't as smooth as it could have been, but every one most definitely had a chance whether they spammed or not, asked a question or not et cetera.  Next time we give it a shot, we'll hopefully be able to figure out a better way of doing things! I'm 100% open for suggestions, and sincerely apologize to those who came away frustrated.  Thanks for giving it a try, though! Again, I hope we'll be able to do better in the future &lt;3
I used to think that girl's didn't grow hair anywhere on their body except their head, then I watched porn. And I realized that girls have been shaving their bodies this whole time.
***HOT!!!!***
This is a personal favorite of mine: [Jaidene Veda &amp; Osaze - Sunday (Jimpster Remix)](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9dekQU5tt7M)
fucking fail boat
Thanks! I'll look into fixing my form and reintegrating OHP into my workout.
[Really](http://i.imgur.com/r9g2TOn.png)
Now that's an angry bird
As far as I myself understand. But with the deadline for whatever the event is called there ain't much point :P oh well
if that turns about to be a bit too dull (a common complaint from those who have complaints about emads) a Powerstroke 3 will liven that thing right up.
Well, Stroud doesn't like Sheamus for the same reasons too.  According to him, Sheamus is a five year old.
Mostly because they're really good at basketball.
awesome dog.  
Thx will save this for future use.
Yes, this place is like a black hole. That black hole is mostly made up of apathy...
FG reference
Plounge Water™ I assume?
Another witty retort brought to you by ThatGhost!  I hope you didn't strain too hard thinking that one up!
Dr. Larry James! He's great and they don't overlap the schedule at all. 
"In Europe, we don't do that. In Europe, if you perform for your team, you're sure of staying,"   I find it hilarious he says this with a straight face, meanwhile his favorite club in England does this seasonally with their best players...including with him.   They all left for bigger paydays because Arsenal wouldnt pony up what they felt they were worth.
I use a William Joseph Current chest pack if I don't need to carry lunch or a hydration bladder. It is not restricting and is more comfortable than my vest in warm weather. I use a Cloudveil Vest more than 50% of the time, but it gets very heavy with a liter of water, and every tool and flybox imaginable. I use a William Joseph Exodus if going on a long hike to a alpine lake, and need layers of clothing and hydration and lunch and safety kit.
Not sure if you're into relationships, but the best way to not get stuck with a kid and still have sex is to find someone who feels the same way as you do about pregnancy. You can always get a vasectomy, she can always get sterilized, or she could also go on some other kind of birth control. I use condoms as my only birth control and my boyfriend and I have *never* had a scare. If you use them correctly, you should be fine. If condoms really had a 2% failure rate, it probably means that one  or both of us are infertile, which wouldn't be a bad thing, but I think it's probably very unlikely.
&gt; 누구 죽 먹을 사람? Anybody wants to eat porridge?  Why does it end with 사람? I'm a beginner and haven't seen a sentence structure like that. If I were trying to write that sentence myself, I'd do:  누구 죽을 막습니까?
Notified the administrative staff at BHS, included the photo.
They prefer 'African'.
Walmart even sells Gorilla Munch! Can you even believe?
Do not mind him, I for one think you are very hot.
Sure looks like a [House Sparrow](http://www.allaboutbirds.org/guide/House_Sparrow/id) to me.
I was expecting them to start mentioning hashish or something too 
My plant's ECCS pumps are 4160. The recirc pumps, control rod drive pumps and circulating water pumps are all 6900.  That's all internal to the plant.  We also have 460V loads (fans, waterleg pumps, motors), 120Vloads (lighting, control, aux loads), 125VDC loads, and 24VDC loads.  ALL of that is internal to the plant.  Outside of the plant is about 22.5kV on the generator, 345 for our switchyard, 138 for our emergency power.   Columbia generating station is 500kV for their main output, 250 for their reserve input, 125kv for emergency input. Internal to the plant they are also 4160 for safety systems and standard loads, 6900 for the heavy duty loads, 460/120 for smaller stuff, and 24VDC/125VDC for DC power loads.
Slow clap.
where the hell do they get money for this :/
I bet the babies just fall out of her vagina.
"expensive *to* create"
I'm kind of sick of this argument though, like when people used to say that because playing an Iberian christian was easy enough that meant it was balanced, or that because a player can stop the fatamids that means they aren't overpowered. I changed a few lines of code to play the pagan lithuanians once and did pretty well, but that doesn't mean that they aren't woefully underpowered compared to the nearby christians, and similarly just because you were able to kill the republics doesn't mean that it isn't extremely infuriating to see them eat up north africa every single game just because I don't happen to be playing there.
I didn't actually read your link; I just answered your question. From what you said, yes, the girl should be punished as well.
[](/bjunimpressed) Ghost.
I would love for the cheap German translator to literally translate every one of those compound words the Germans are so fond of. It would be fantastic to try and figure out what they were talking about.
I just wouldn't go. He can't legally force you to go to church, as far as him closing down work for the day though that's his business and he's allowed to do that
Nearly the same cards
1 month later, still a great post.
Electrical engineer specializing in RF/Antennas, and small scale analog/digital electronics @ Carleton University.  Most of my friends are getting a Masters to hide from the job market, and once I'm done my contract position I will too.
It's from a Guiness advert  [Video clip](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NBh895KdXAU)  [Image](http://i.imgur.com/z8cFQyO.jpg)
[](/trixpoker)You have a gut feeling that you like Hitler?
Unreal tournament?
&gt;Men want to get to the top and they'll climb on anyone  Actually i believe it's the other way around, women usually do that much more often than men.
nope
whats your area?? would help to know where you are.
*Both him and his shadow begin chanting*
Girl slaps a guy, he deserved it. Guy slap a girl, its abuse.
A giant obedient camel spider that I could ride around. Who is really going to mess with me?
unfortunately, its a myth  http://news.nationalgeographic.com/news/2005/12/1219_051219_drunk_elephant_2.html
lol, same thing happened to me.  except, the weird part is that he knows she's slept with everyone. we're still friends and hang out to this day, hahaha.  although she moved to chicago so i almost never see her again which probably makes it less awkward.
Thank you.
Alameda CA?
/r/upvotegifs :)
Oh yeah? Well realise is the wrong way to spell realize!  (runs away)
havemeier
Not saying she is, but she looks like Morgan Layne pre-boobjob and with black hair.
Their orbit will eventually decay, causing them to fall out of orbit and into the Earth's atmosphere
13 hours ago  http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/19e1qf/taylor_swift_i_knew_you_were_trouble_wicker_man/
10/10 WOULD ATTEMPT ROBBERY AGAIN
Don't do obby maul at all lol just a waste of time to get 60 str with 1 atk for you to realize it isn't as effective as other options 
You talked about specific Christians in order to make your point, but you generalized all atheists on Reddit. I'm sure you'll find that it is the 10% that make 90% of the noise. 
I was more thorough in my research (wow that lends it an undeserving air of importance) and got [this](http://www.oed.com/view/Entry/180362?rskey=XUoVzP&amp;result=1#eid)! Specifically numbers 7 and 9.
You are a total GGG
not all Canadians hate Americans, but I do agree with you. I think it's partly because Canadians are the underdog.... kind of like New Zealand to Australia. 
but im super duper bored you guyyzzz
Hey man, not trying to be a downer, but have you talked to a doctor about what this could do to your knees and ankles?
Bad management is bad management. If you start using your own heroin I imagine it would be very easy to get sloppy and fuck it up. Or wind up in jail or buried in some tall weeds somewhere.
Perhaps this is a stupid question, but if it's as heavy as it appears to be, how does it stay high up in the atmosphere? Does wind keep it moving? (Do greenhouse gases even need to be high up to have an effect?)  I understand that I could be totally wrong, but I'm getting a "properties being confused with its effects" vibe here, like when people say that water's dangerous because it can cause you to drown.
Fuck it, the Tories, UKIP and BNP should all just change their logos to swastikas and be done with it
Creepy racist copy-pasta. 
What a faggot.
It does. Adsense blocks low-text sites. Note that only original content is counted (Google filters out detected copied content for text count). A search engine would be highly unlikely to support adsense.  Google has no interest in adding adsense to a site that doesn't have own content. Adsense builds on top of existing content and visitor data.  There's a separate program "Adsense for Search" you should take a look at: https://support.google.com/adsense/bin/answer.py?hl=en&amp;answer=9879  Also note that Adsense doesn't allow fluid content. Ads need to be placed on static, unchanging parts of your site. Adding adsense results mid-search isn't allowed.  Your site will not be able to support Adsense in the way you want.
Can someone please explain to me how in the world something from 9gag made it to the front page?? Is this not Reddit?!?!
This article put a smile on my face. This type of optimism is what humanity needs more often. Something to tell the next person the world is still growing and that a major new age is upon us. I hope i live long enough to see history unfold in front of our eyes. The past couple of years have been a new one for humanity. By just turning on the internet you are able to watch as history unfolds in front of our eyes. But after "Most" golden ages there is a dark age. Are we on the cusp of a major war and don't even know it? People 50 years from now will say that we should of seen it happening in front of our eyes and should of prevented it. Is humanity progressing to fast while not growing as a culture more? I guess we won't know until it happens. I wish you all luck with the coming years and hopefully nothing happens.
I found this while searching for information on trihybrid crosses and it made me smile.
Your first born child, as long as they aren't a red head.
Building on Stephan's response, the root problem you bring up refers to convergent validity. Imagine that a perfect conceptualization of "introversion" exists. In order to assess that construct, you need to show that multiple measures that are very different are all correlated to one another. Don Campbell referred to this as "heterogeneity of irrelevancies". Essentially this mean that any measure will assess a construct to a certain degree, but it will also miss the mark a little bit. That is why it's important that we use different measures for the same construct so that when we statisitcally isolate their shared variance, we are working with the core nugget of introversion and not any of the fringe, statistical junk, Campbell also called this the local molar causal validity".   tl;dr: Yes, Likert items are fine and they are no different from any other behavioral measure, insomuch as they accurately assess the same construct. 
And people that can't use an ellipsis- you only need three dots, **just three**
Kansas can pass whatever stupid law they want, but they should probably care if they're passing a demonstrably ineffective law that wastes taxpayer money like  welfare drug testing.
it would suck to begin carving that and not have all of it be solid rock, like a crevice or something.
The Dundas block between Wellington and Clarence is better than say, Dundas between Clarence and Richmond or anywhere on Dundas between Maitland and Highbury.  But it's still not great.  I would consider it to be part of the downtown core.  I think the library and banks on this block keep more of the "undesirables" away, but they're still around.
I wouldn't install them, just download to have them available for installation.
My Cousin is in China. He says women won't even consider marrying a man if he doesn't have a house. 
Oh my god, he's the best actor we've ever seen. 
Because it is a gathering place for homeless people. And I am pretty sure the shopkeepers are just renting the buildings and I don't know if they stay long enough to actually fix up the place. Plus, like he said all they do is sell "Fuck you you fucking fuck" shirts. I really don't think that is that big of a business.   Venice beach isn't the beautiful Southern California beach that you would take your family to. It is just a place to chill with your homies, skate, work out, eat shitty food, maybe buy some things from a street vendor, and see a man jump on a pile of broken glass. 
why?
I'm going to continue to upvote corporate produced links with good content. Srynotsry.
I was playing with a group of girls at a sleepover when I was 9, when the brother of one of girls started pestering us wanting to join in. We told him he could if he shoved a tampon up his ass and left it there for the whole game. He did. He showed us. He played. 
jesus fuck i hovered over the link and the site name literally has the words cockroach lies dead on its back killed.
Love me.
Eye on the ball. Eye on your opponent. 
made the nitrons worse? i think the nitrons (dont) work as (un)reliable as before
I hope all is well, and its not a real sign that markers anything terrible. Thank you :)
I think a lot of people have bad experiences with ticketing systems, so they shy away from them. I found JIRA to be exceptionally helpful at my last job, while my coworkers seemed to hate the idea of ticketing. Probably has something to do with how the people submit tickets, and what trivialities they waste time filing tickets for.  I couldn't imagine doing IT without a ticket system. For systems work, perhaps it is overkill, but I found it very beneficial in keeping myself on task and organized in the various projects I was working on.
Oops. My bad. :S
In theory you could, however this would be considered a custom design and we'd charge extra for it. Email info@dbrand.com if you want more details.
Go as hot as your oven will let you, and make sure the stone is just as hot
That's...pretty awful man. Why would you want to see that? 
Statistically, you're more likely to kill a loved one or yourself with a gun than a home intruder.  Does that stop people from buying guns for self-defense?  
http://i.imgur.com/yLIVhAq.jpg  Sprained ankle. 
It actually is.  Try going to /r/technology and tell them to buy music rather than torrent.
That I was in the hospital for a possible heart attack at 38 years old. Scared the shit out of my parents.
This is /r/technology where piracy is some sort of birth given right. It's pretty nonsensical and I don't really get it but unfortunately we are in the minority here.
A bit of a sad update: my parents took her to the vet and they still don't know what made her sick. Her temperature was 10 degrees below normal, so they have her under a lot of blankets. They also think she might have some sort of infection or blockage as she was bleeding a bit down there. She's getting oxygen and is hooked up to IVs getting antibiotics of some sort.   My mom said she was able to go in and see her after a while, and she seemed slightly perkier and let her pet her.
Is it possible to get a download link for Good Slambrations as well? Your slams are fantastic.
9,894,949 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,894,949 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around - 9,894,948 bottles of beer on the wall!
No. The worst I have had happen when removing caffeine from my daily, constant intake was a headache. 
Where do you want it?
How great would it be to live in his head. The shit that must go on in there must be crazy. On second thought it wouldn't be great, I'd go crazy.
A girl that sucks a dick in a game of truth or dare isn't very classy. Same goes for the dude. Unless you're into that, which most people aren't. It isn't so much misogyny as a cultural understanding of sexual norms.
Pretending to be a women, crossdressing and pretending to be raped by several men.
It's a $6.5M qualifying offer. Will O'Reilly be worth $6.5M in a couple years? That's first-line centre franchise-player money.
Lol, too true.  Hell, I imagine a lot of ppl would hate my ideas now. ha
Both Bad Company 1 and 1943 were console exclusives. Up until this point the entire fanbase of battlefield was more or less 95% PC gamers
It really is fucking pathetic. Most of the time their is 100% preventable too.
I'll have him buzz around then. 
[ta daa](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Caucasian_Albania)
There was this farm party when I was around 15 years old. Everyone was told to bring different types of alcohol or they'd regret it. Guess who forgot to bring alcohol...  So the person who didn't bring any alcohol had to be subject to one dare, no pussying out, no limits. Basically i had no choice or say in the dare, i could only agree and do it.   So, in the middle of the party the host (girl who was same age as me) shouts that it's time for brockotaco to do the dare. She gets all her girl friends together and they plan the most embarrassing, exposing, devious dare ever. "You have to let us blindfold you, tie you up, and do whatever we want for 15 minutes."  EDIT: Here's what happened  It felt like they were putting cold water on me. They told me it was ketchup, mustard, and other shit like peanut butter. Eventually they started to get pervy ideas, and soon enough my pants are being pulled off. I feel the cold water again but on my shlong. I freaked out, mainly because they whispered to take pictures. I'll never know if they did, but it was embarrassing as hell, and i was really nervous of nudes circulating or something.  Someone said "We still have like 10 minutes left, what else can we do?" And i hear my friends voice say "LICK IT OFF!!" I literally thanked god for his existence right then and there because without him i wouldn't have gotten a bj that night. 
